Donald Trump|Speech: Donald Trump in Colorado Springs, CO|July 29, 2016
[This was transcribed and punctuated by Factba.se's AI, Margaret, and automatically corrected based on her understanding of Donald Trump's speech patterns. It has not been edited by a human. Please double-check any quotes against the video.]
Thank you. Thank you very much. So I don't have to thank you very much. So I don't have to thank you very much. So I don't have to tell you this is why our country doesn't tell you this is why our country doesn't tell you this is why our country doesn't work. You understand. So we have thousands work, you understand.
So we have thousands work, you understand. So we have thousands of people in a room next door. We have of people in a room next door. We have of people in a room next door. We have plenty of space here. We have thousands, plenty of space here. We have thousands, plenty of space here. We have thousands of people outside trying to get in and of people outside trying to get in and of people outside trying to get in and we have a fire marshal that said we - we have a fire marshal that said we we have a fire marshal.
That said, we can't allow more people. It really is so unfair to the people. I'm - it really is so unfair to the people. I'm - it really is so unfair to the people, I'm so sorry and I have to apologize, but so sorry and I have to apologize. But - so - sorry and I have to apologize, but it's not my fault, I just came here, but it's not my fault.
I just came here, but it's not my fault. I just came here. But we have thousands of beautiful, wonderful, we have thousands of beautiful, wonderful. We have thousands of beautiful, wonderful, great people outside and we have in the great people outside and we have in the great people outside and we have in the room next door over a thousand people room next door over a thousand people room next door over a Thousand people, they won't let them in and the reason they won't let them in and the reason they won't let them in.
And the reason that won't let them in is because they - that won't let them in is because they - that won't let them in is because they don't know what the hell they're doing. Don't know what the hell they're doing, don't know what the hell they're doing. That's why, okay, too bad. That's why our - that's why, okay, too bad.
That's why our - that's why, okay, too bad. That's why our country has robbed, hey, maybe they're a country, has robbed, hey, maybe they're a country, has robbed, hey, maybe they're a Hillary person. Could that be present, Hillary person, could that be present? Hillary person, could that be present? Probably?
I don't think there are too probably. I don't think there are too probably. I don't think there are too many of them. I don't think there are too many of them. I don't think there are too many of them. I don't think there are too many of them, many of them, many of them anyway. They set up a screen in the other anyway.
They set up a screen in the other anyway. They set up a screen in the other room, they set up something outside, but room, they set up something outside, but room, they set up something outside, but what a disgraceful situation. So but you what a disgraceful situation. So but you what a disgraceful situation.
So - but you people can't be complaining, right? All people can't be complaining, right? All people can't be complaining, right? All right, so much so much to straighten out in so much so much to straighten out in so much so much to straighten out in this country. This is the kind of - this is this country, this is the kind of - this is this country, this is the kind of - this is the kind of thing we have in federal.
The kind of thing we have in federal, the kind of thing we have in federal government also by the way folks you government also by the way folks you government also by the way folks you know. And then you wonder why we're going know. And then you wonder why we're going know and then you wonder why we're going to hell.
That's why we're going to hell to hell. That's why we're going to hell to hell. That's why we're going to hell so thought you know what it is, it's a so thought you know what it is. It's a so thought you know what it is. It's a thought process, right. So I watched last thought process, right? So I watched last thought process, right?
So I watched last night I watched Hillary Clinton quad has night. I watched Hillary Clinton quad has night. I watched Hillary Clinton quad has said what a sad situation and by the way said what a sad situation. And by the way said, what a sad situation and by the way, they're going to let some of these - they're going to let some of these - they're going to let some of these people, I just was informed.
They're gonna people, I just was informed, they're gonna people, I just was informed, they're gonna let some of them meander in the engine too bad. But I watched her last night too bad. But I watched her last night too bad. But I watched her last night giving a speech that was so average and giving a speech that was so average and giving a speech that was so average.
And I watched last night as the network said, I watched last night as the network said, I watched last night as the network said, it was all right, it was good. They were - it was all right, it was good. They were - it was all right. It was good, they were fine and then I watched this morning it fine and then I watched this morning it fine and then I watched this morning it was unbelievable.
It was so wonderful. It was unbelievable. It was so wonderful. It was unbelievable. It was so wonderful. It was a wonderful folks and then I read was a wonderful folks and then I read was a wonderful folks and then I read their report that just came out. I can't - their report that just came out. I can't - their report that just came out.
I can't believe it in Politico Politico. I can't believe it in Politico Politico. I can't believe it in Politico Politico. I can't believe that and they wrote something, believe that and they wrote something, believe that and they wrote something old cliches all just written up by his old cliches all just written up by his old cliches all just written up by his - by a scriptwriter.
And it was all cliches by a scriptwriter and it was all cliches by a scriptwriter and it was all cliches. You know, they used a little tweak one on, you know, they used a little tweak one on, you know, they used a little tweak. One on me about tweet and she said something me about tweet and she said something me about tweet and she said something about the campaign.
Donald Trump doesn't about the campaign. Donald Trump doesn't about the campaign. Donald Trump doesn't know how to campaign something like that, know how to campaign, something like that, know how to campaign, something like that. I just beat 16 people and I'm beating - I just beat 16 people and I'm beating - I just beat 16 people and I'm beating her.
No, thanks. I'm watching it. I'm watching. No thanks. I'm watching it. I'm watching. No thanks. I'm watching it. I'm watching it. Oh, and by the way, this is very it. Oh, and by the way, this is very it. Oh, and by the way, this is very important. So the Nielsen ratings just important, so the Nielsen ratings just important, so the Nielsen ratings just came out, came out, came out.
These aren't polls, these are for - these aren't polls, these are for - these aren't polls. These are for television much more important than television. Much more important than television, much more important than polls, you know television, these guys polls, you know, television, these guys polls, you know, television, these guys don't care about.
Ray, they don't care, don't care about ray, they don't care, don't care about ray. They don't care about polls. They only care about ratings about polls. They only care about ratings about polls. They only care about ratings and the Nielsen ratings just came out. So - and the Nielsen ratings just came out, so - and the Nielsen ratings just came out, so it's Trump against Clinton, right, and you - it's Trump against Clinton, right, and you - it's Trump against Clinton, right?
And you know, you heard about how wonderful cuz know you heard about how wonderful cuz know you heard about how wonderful cuz. I'll tell you what I liked the - I'll tell you what I liked the - I'll tell you what I liked the Republican convention better. I did. I Republican convention better, I did I Republican convention better.
I did. I liked it, liked it, liked it. I like to follow. I thought we had a far I like to follow. I thought we had a far I like to follow. I thought we had a far more beautiful set like not even a more beautiful set like not even a more beautiful set like not even a contest. How about the first night they contest, how about the first night they contest, how about the first night.
They had no American flags up from the stage second night, no American flags and then second night, no American flags. And then second night, no American flags. And then I started saying there are no American, I started saying there are no American. I started saying there are no American flags up there and then they run up with flags up there and then they run up with flags up there and then they run up with a flag, right?
And then last night they a flag, right? And then last night they a flag, right? And then last night they put so many flags, you know, it's called put so many flags, you know, it's called put so many flags, you know, it's called overkill, it's called incompetence, they overkill, it's called incompetence, they overkill, it's called incompetence.
They put so many flags up there. You didn't put so many flags up there. You didn't put so many flags up there. You didn't know what to do. You didn't know what to know what to do. You didn't know what to know what to do. You didn't know what to do, but let me just tell you. So Thursday do, but let me just tell you.
So Thursday do, but let me just tell you. So Thursday, Thursday, that's the big one, right, Thursday, that's the big one, right? Thursday, that's the big one, right. Thursday, we beat her by minions on Thursday. We beat her by minions on Thursday. We beat her by minions on television. We beat her by a lot and they both did.
We beat her by a lot and they both did. We beat her by a lot and they both did good, good, good. Really we beat her by a lot, but honestly really we beat her by a lot. But honestly really we beat her by a lot. But honestly, the numbers were incredible, which tells the numbers were incredible, which tells the numbers were incredible, which tells you which tells you isn't it good to you, which tells you isn't it good to you, which tells you isn't it good to have Trump running for the Presidency now let me ask you, so we beat her, we now let me ask you.
So we beat her. We now let me ask you. So we beat her, we beat her and I think you tuned in out of beat her and I think you tuned in out of beat her and I think you tuned in out of curiosity with her, you had most people curiosity with her, you had most people Curiosity with her, you had most people of you.
I was actually more curious of you. I was actually more curious of you. I was actually more curious. I was curious to see whether she'd do a - I was curious to see whether she'd do a - I was curious to see whether she'd do a class act and not mention my name or class act and not mention my name or class act and not mention my Name or mention it with respect like say, I'd mention it with respect like say I'd mention it with respect like say, I'd like to congratulate my Republican, like to congratulate my Republican, like to congratulate my Republican opponent for having done something that opponent for having done something That opponent for having done something that nobody has ever done in the history of nobody has ever done in the history of nobody has ever done in the history of politics in this nation.
And I would like to congratulate my and I would like to congratulate my and I would like to congratulate my opponent for having gotten more votes opponent for having gotten more votes opponent for having gotten more votes than anybody in the history of the than anybody in The history of the - than anybody in the history of the Republican Party in the primary system, Republican Party in the primary system, Republican Party in the primary system, see I thought she might do stuff like see I thought she might do stuff like see I thought she Might do stuff like that that that I thought she'd give me a big fat.
I thought she'd give me a big fat. I thought she'd give me a big fat, beautiful. Congratulation, you know, if she beautiful, congratulation, you know if she beautiful, congratulation. You know if she did that, would that - would that have been - did that - would that - would that have been - did that - would that - would that have been cool, would that have been - would that cool, would that have been - would that cool, would that have been - would that Have been great, have been great, have been great.
I thought her daughter did very well by. I thought her daughter did very well by. I thought her daughter did very well. By the way, Chelsea, I thought she did very the way Chelsea. I thought she did very the way Chelsea. I thought she did very well and my daughter likes Chelsea and well and my daughter likes Chelsea and well.
And my daughter likes Chelsea and Chelsea likes my daughter, what are you? Chelsea likes my daughter, what are you? Chelsea likes my daughter, what are you gonna do, that's the way it is right gonna do. That's the way it is right gonna do. That's the way it is, right, that's okay, that's okay, that's okay, that's okay, that's okay, that's okay.
My daughter likes Chelsea, Ivanka Ivanka. My daughter likes Chelsea, Ivanka Ivanka. My daughter likes Chelsea, Ivanka Ivanka did great, right? But I asked Ivanka. I did great right? But I asked Ivanka. I did great right? But I asked Ivanka. I said you like Chelsea. I do dead. Really said you like Chelsea, I do dead really said you like Chelsea, I do dead really.
No, I really do, ah, I wish you didn't it. No, I really do. Ah, I wish you didn't it. No, I really do, ah, I wish you didn't. It would be a lot easier, right, would be a lot easier, right, would be a lot easier, right? No? But they like a gel. She likes you, no. But they like a gel. She likes you, no. But they like a gel.
She likes you Ivanka. And so I think that's nice then Ivanka. And so I think that's nice then Ivanka. And so I think that's nice then that's the way life is. And that's the - that's the way life is and that's the - that's the way life is and that's the way life should be, right. Don't we agree way life should be right?
Don't we agree way life should be right? Don't we agree? It's okay, it's okay. But we had - I had an - it's okay, it's okay. But we had - I had an - it's okay, it's okay. But we had - I had an amazing time and I - I watched last night amazing time and I - I watched last night amazing time and I - I watched last night as different people spoke.
Much of it was as different people spoke. Much of it was as different people spoke, much of it was scripted, much of it was scripted. I see scripted, much of it was scripted. I see scripted, much of it was scripted. I see some people. I see some people, you know some people. I see some people, you know some people I see some people, you know it was funny I said yesterday one of the - it was funny I said yesterday one of the - it was funny I said yesterday one of the rallies with his massive rallies rallies with his Massive rallies rallies with his massive rallies, honestly much bigger than this, but not honestly much bigger than this, but not honestly much bigger than this, but not much bigger if you let all the other much bigger.
If you let all the other much bigger, if you let all the other thousands in, but much bigger, this is thousands in but much bigger. This is thousands in but much bigger. This is like an intimate gathering, it's true. But like an intimate gathering, it's true. But like an intimate gathering, it's true, but I said I said to some of the people I said, I said to some of the people I said, I said to some of the people look at that and then yesterday at the look at that.
And then yesterday at the look at that and then yesterday at the rally I said, boy, because I had some rally. I said boy, because I had some rally. I said boy, because I had some people up there that I knew and I people up there that I knew and I people up there that I knew and I actually saw their names and I said, well, actually saw their names.
And I said, well, actually saw their names and I said, well, that's why would they put them up. That's why would they put them up. That's why would they put them up? They're gonna speak. So positively about they're gonna speak. So positively about they're gonna speak, so positively about me, I was wrong and I said all I'm gonna me, I was wrong and I said all I'm gonna me, I was wrong and I said all I'm gonna hit them, I'm gonna get Them am I gonna hit them, I'm gonna get them, am I gonna hit them?
I'm gonna get them, am I gonna get them? I'm gonna start talking about get them, I'm gonna start talking about get them, I'm gonna start talking about them like you them, like you them, like you ever believed. I'm gonna hit them now ever believed. I'm gonna hit them now ever believed. I'm gonna hit them now.
Obviously, I'm talking about with my verb, obviously, I'm talking about with my verb, obviously, I'm talking about with my verb all. So I'm gonna get them. I'm gonna let all - so I'm gonna get them. I'm gonna let all - so I'm gonna get them. I'm gonna let them have it maybe a tweet or maybe this them have it maybe a tweet or maybe this them have it, maybe a tweet or maybe this or that, but I'm gonna hit them hard.
So I'm gonna hit him are so in CNN, this I'm gonna hit him are so in CNN, this I'm gonna hit him are so in CNN this morning. I see you know, in the bottom morning, I see you know, in the bottom morning, I see, you know in the bottom Trump says he's going to hit speakers. I mean, they are so dishonest, I'm gonna hit mean they are so dishonest, I'm gonna hit mean they are so dishonest, I'm gonna hit speakers.
Oh, yeah, yeah, that's why we have speakers. Oh yeah, yeah, that's why we have speakers. Oh, yeah, yeah, that's why we have to win, right. That's why we have to do to win, right. That's why we have to do to win, right. That's why we have to do that. I'll tell you that - I'll tell you that I'll tell you CNN is really - you know, they call it the CNN is really, you know, they call it the CNN is really, you know, they call it the Clinton news network.
It's really a Clinton news network. It's really a Clinton news network. It's really a dishonest group of people. They are dishonest group of people. They are dishonest group of people. They are terrible, terrible, terrible. Oh, their camera just went off. You know, I - Oh, their camera just went off. You know, I - Oh, their camera just went off, you know, I see the red lights.
I know I know all the see the red lights. I know I know all the see the red lights. I know I know all the cameramen by now, right? I fellas, but I cameramen by now, right? I fellas but I cameramen by now, right? I fellas. But I see the red lights that red light, just see the red lights that red light, just see the red lights, that red light just went off so fast.
It was funny we were having fun. Yes, I - it was funny we were having fun. Yes, I - it was funny we were having fun. Yes, I said they said really bad things. I'm said they said really bad things. I'm said they said really bad things. I'm gonna hit them, I'm gonna hit them hard, gonna hit them. I'm gonna hit them hard, gonna hit them.
I'm gonna hit them hard. We're gonna get him and I almost - I said we're gonna get him and I almost - I said we're gonna get him and I almost I said in fact I even called up a friend of in fact, I even called up a friend of in Fact, I even called up a friend of mine, a governor called up he actually mine a governor called up.
He actually mine a governor called up. He actually called me, he said you're doing great called me. He said you're doing great called me. He said you're doing great, fantastic and I talked about the thing fantastic and I talked about the thing fantastic and I talked about the thing he said don't do anything, don't do he said don't do anything, don't do he said, don't do anything, don't do anything.
Don't say anything bad about anything, don't say anything bad about anything, don't say anything bad about anybody don't talk. I told them to anybody don't talk. I told them to anybody don't talk. I told them to destroy yesterday and then they put destroy yesterday and then they put destroy yesterday and then they put Trump to hit because at some place said Trump to hit because at some place said Trump to hit because at some place said I'm gonna Hit them on would hit a mark, I'm gonna hit them on would hit a mark, I'm gonna hit them on would hit a mark.
I mean verbally right does everybody, I mean verbally right does everybody I mean verbally right does everybody understand headline Trump threatens, understand, headline Trump, threatens, understand, headline Trump threatens, right, I don't know if they said that, but right, I don't know if they said that.
But right, I don't know if they said that, but it is really - I'll tell you CNN is - so it is really - I'll tell you CNN is - so it is really - I'll tell you, CNN is so dishonest, it's - it's actually disgusting dishonest, it's - it's actually disgusting dishonest. It's - it's actually disgusting, you want another truth.
So - so I love you want another truth. So - so I love you want another truth. So - so I love isn't it better when we don't have these, isn't it better? When we don't have these, isn't it better? When we don't have these teleprompters right, I watch, I watch teleprompters, right? I watch, I watch teleprompters, right?
I watch, I watch chili no way no matter where she goes chili, no way no matter where she goes chili, no way no matter where she goes, she's got teleprompters and I like using - she's got teleprompters and I like using - she's got teleprompters and I like using Teleprompters, they're really good, but teleprompters they're really good.
But teleprompters they're really good. But - but you know honestly when you do these, but you know honestly when you do these, but you know honestly when you do these things, would it be bad about, okay, if I'm things, would it be bad about, okay, if I'm things, would it be bad about, Okay, if I'm standing here like this and I'm going standing here like this and I'm going standing here like this and I'm going ladies and gentlemen of Colorado.
Welcome, ladies and gentlemen of Colorado. Welcome, ladies and gentlemen of Colorado. Welcome. Welcome. Welcome, welcome. Oh, lift that teleprompter a little, Oh, lift that teleprompter a little, Oh, lift that teleprompter a little business. Well, wouldn't it be nice if she business well, wouldn't it be nice if she business?
Well, wouldn't it be nice if she would actually get up? And just talk to - would actually get up and just talk to - would actually get up and just talk to the crowd, it'd be real and she had a - the crowd, it'd be real and she had a - the crowd it'd be real. And she had a speech this morning and they're reading speech this morning and they're reading speech this morning and they're reading teleprompters.
You know, she is a group of teleprompters. You know, she is a group of teleprompters. You know, she is a group of 12 people. She's got teleprompters in 12 people. She's got teleprompters in 12 people. She's got teleprompters in front and then she doesn't do news front and then she doesn't do news front and then she doesn't do news conferences.
She hasn't done one and like conferences, she hasn't done one. And like conferences, she hasn't done one and like what is it 237 days, something like she, what is it, 237 days, something like she, what is it? 237 days, something like she hasn't done a news conference in, hasn't done a news conference in, hasn't done a news conference in something like 237 days.
And and honestly something like 237 days. And - and honestly something like 237 days. And and honestly, the reason is he couldn't do a news. The reason is he couldn't do a news. The reason is he couldn't do a news conference because they'll ask her about conference because they'll ask her about conference because they'll ask her about all the different things that she's done, all the different things that she's done, all the different things that she's done.
They'll ask her about the FBI saying they'll ask her about the FBI saying they'll ask her about the FBI saying she's a liar. They'll ask her about all. She's a liar. They'll ask her about all. She's a liar. They'll ask her about all of the emails that she deleted or a of the emails that she deleted or a of the emails that she deleted or a racer got rid of 33,000 emails.
You know racer got rid of 33,000 emails, you know racer got rid of 33,000 emails. You know the ones that were done, the ones that the ones that were done, the ones that the ones that were done, the ones that were done for her yoga class right yoga were done for her yoga class, right yoga were done for her yoga class right Yoga yoga, the ones that were done for the yoga, the ones that were done for the yoga, the ones that were done for the wedding 33,000, I've done a lot of wedding 33,000. I've done a lot of wedding 33,000. I've done a lot of weddings, heavens weddings, heavens, weddings, heavens 33000. I mean how stupid is everybody has 33000. I mean how stupid is everybody has 33000. I mean how stupid is everybody has stupid idea this 33,000 emails for the stupid idea.
This 33,000 emails for the stupid idea, this 33,000 emails for the yoga, yoga and a wedding and they were yoga, yoga and a wedding and they were yoga, yoga and a wedding and they were personal. I'll bet you in this room. We personal - I'll bet you in this room. We personal - I'll bet you in this room. We have people that probably I'm not a big - have people that probably I'm not a big have people that probably I'm not a big email person.
You know why I've email person. You know why I've email person, you know why I've intelligent, I nobody bill, I'm not a intelligent, I nobody bill, I'm not a intelligent, I nobody bill, I'm not a biggie. I don't like even you know what I biggie. I don't like even you know what I biggie, I don't like even you know what I like.
I like the old days like I like the old days like I like the old days. I like the discus today. They just - I like the discus today. They just - I like the discus today, they just announced somebody else was hacked and announced somebody else was hacked and announced somebody else was hacked and another group was how everybody's being another group was how everybody's being another group was how everybody's being hacked, okay.
They have no idea who's hacked, okay? They have no idea who's hacked, okay? They have no idea who's doing it. They have no idea is doing it, doing it. They have no idea is doing it, doing it. They have no idea is doing it. These things are amazing. You know the - these things are amazing. You know the - these things are amazing.
You know the kids growing up. I have a young boy kids growing up. I have a young boy kids growing up. I have a young boy Barron he's very smart, but he's using Barron. He's very smart, but he's using Barron. He's very smart, but he's using the computer so much. We put it on lock the computer so much. We put it on lock the computer so much.
We put it on lock right, no way he can find out. I mean I right, no way he can find out. I mean I right, no way he can find out. I mean I don't know what happened. So we go back, don't know what happened. So we go back, don't know what happened. So we go back about an hour later and he's playing about an hour later and he's playing about an hour later and he's playing with the computer.
We had it alone and we with the computer, we had it alone and we with the computer, we had it alone and we said wait a minute, we had it on lock, you said wait a minute, we had it on lock, you said wait a minute. We had it on lock, you needed a sequential number and we said needed a sequential number and we said needed a sequential number and we said Baron, how did you do that?
I'm not Baron. How did you do that? I'm not Baron. How did you do that? I'm not telling you, dad, no, these kids a genius telling you, dad, no, these kids a genius telling you dad, no, these kids a genius and it's getting worse and worse because - and it's getting worse and worse because - and it's getting worse and worse because they live With it, you know, I grew up and they live with it.
You know, I grew up and they live with it. You know, I grew up and it was a certain age, they start now they - it was a certain age, they start now they - it was a certain age, they start now, they live with it. It's like it's like their live with it. It's like - it's like their live with it. It's like it's like their right arm.
They can do it so well. And I right arm, they can do it so well and I right arm, they can do it so well. And I like the old days, especially for the like the old days, especially for the like the old days, especially for the military and things like that, right? You military and things like that, right?
You military and things like that, right? You want to attack or you want to do - want to attack or you want to do - want to attack or you want to do something, something something it's called courier, it's called let's - it's called courier, it's called let's - it's called courier, it's called, let's put it in Our thing put it in an - put it in our thing, put it in an - put it in our thing, put it in an envelope and let's hand it to the envelope and let's hand it to the envelope and let's hand it to the general, let's not send It over the wires general, let's not send it over the wires general, let's not send it over the wires.
So everybody's probably read again, right? So everybody's probably read again, right? So everybody's probably read again, right? And no matter how good no matter how and no matter how good no matter how and no matter how good no matter how good they say it is, it's not - I mean good, they say it is, it's not - I mean good, they say it is, it's not.
I mean people can hack it, I guess it's just people can hack it. I guess it's just people can hack it. I guess it's just terrible. And you know, if you talk about terrible and you know if you talk about terrible and you know if you talk about military and you talk about all these military and you talk about all these military and you talk about all these secrets and you even talk About politics secrets and you even talk about politics, secrets and you even talk about politics, if you talk about all of this stuff, it's - if you talk about all of this stuff, it's - if you talk about all of this stuff, it's very confidential stuff.
And then you very confidential stuff and then you very confidential stuff and then you find out the hacking is all over the find out the hacking is all over the find out. The hacking is all over the place place place. I hear China is brutal, they say Russia, I hear China is brutal. They say Russia, I hear China is brutal, they say Russia is excellent and you have guys sitting is excellent and you have guys sitting is excellent and you have guys sitting in the home that are very good.
You have in the home that are very good. You have in the home that are very good, you have people, men and women sitting in their people, men and women sitting in their people, men and women sitting in their homes and they're better than the people homes and they're better than the people homes and they're Better than the people that are the inventors and I don't know that are the inventors and I don't know that are the inventors.
And I don't know there's something about - there's something about - there's something about, you know, General Douglas MacArthur, right, you know General Douglas, MacArthur, right? You know, General Douglas MacArthur, right? They'd have a guy come, he'd say, sir here. They'd have a guy come, he'd say, sir here.
They'd have a guy come. He'd say, sir here it is. That's it. It is. That's it. It is. That's it. The risk is from there to there General, the risk is from there to there General. The risk is from there to there General George Patton. I guarantee you General George Patton, I guarantee you General George Patton.
I guarantee you General George Patton who was rough as hell. He George Patton, who was rough as hell he George Patton, who was rough as hell, he wouldn't be doing emails when he's going wouldn't be doing emails when he's going wouldn't be doing emails when he's going to be ready to attack if he were around to be Ready to attack if he were around to be ready to attack if he were around, he'd say, I don't like that system at all.
He'd say I don't like that system at all. He'd say I don't like that system at all. So thank you, darling. I love you. So thank you, darling. I love you. So thank you, darling. I love you. I love you. I love you and I think it's a - I love you, I love you and I think it's a - I love you, I love you and I think it's a guy.
I mean, I don't know who to help you guy. I mean, I don't know who to help you guy. I mean, I don't know who to help you. Thank you. Oh, no, it's not beautiful. Thank, thank you. Oh, no, it's not beautiful. Thank, thank you. Oh, no, it's not beautiful. Thank you very much. Thank you very much and you very much.
Thank you very much and you very much. Thank you very much. And now I see you - I like that much better. I now I see you, I like that much better. I now I see you, I like that much better. I appreciate that. So thank you honey. Appreciate that. So thank you honey. Appreciate that. So thank you honey. Yeah, I don't know, hey to thousands of - yeah, I don't know, hey to thousands of - yeah, I don't know.
Hey to thousands of people on the other side that the fire people on the other side that the fire people on the other side that the fire marshals aren't being very nice to. They marshals aren't being very nice to. They marshals aren't being very nice to. They don't love me so much right now, okay, but don't love me so much right now, okay, but don't love me so much right now, okay, but that's okay and we're gonna come over, that's okay and we're gonna come over, that's okay and we're gon Na come over and see them when this is finished and see them when this is finished and see them when this is finished.
Should I do that or should I stay with - should I do that or should I stay with - should I do that or should I stay with you longer? Let's go up, right. Welcome up you longer. Let's go up, right, welcome up you longer. Let's go up. Right. Welcome up we're gonna come over, we're gonna come. We're gonna come over, we're gonna come, we're gonna come over, we're gonna come over.
So a lot of things happen now I over. So a lot of things happen now I over. So a lot of things happen now. I found last night interesting because found last night, interesting because found last night interesting because we're gonna get a lot of Bernie, we're gonna get a lot of Bernie, we're gonna get a lot of Bernie supporters.
I think ad and Bernie made a supporters. I think ad and Bernie made a supporters, I think ad and Bernie made a big mistake, the mistake he made and this big mistake the mistake he made and this big mistake the mistake he made and this is the beauty of doing speeches like is the beauty Of doing speeches like is the beauty of doing speeches like this because it was late in the night this because it was late in the night this because it was late in the night and I saw it and she was thanking.
And I saw it and she was thanking and I saw it and she was thanking burning and talking about Bernie and burning and talking about Bernie and burning and talking about Bernie and he's sitting there like glum did you. He's sitting there like glum did you. He's sitting there like glum. Did you notice that?
No smile, his wife, Pat's him notice that no smile. His wife, Pat's him notice that no smile. His wife, Pat's him in the back and she pulled the hand away in the back and she pulled the hand away in the back and she pulled the hand away. Whoa, whoa, did you see that a pat, on the whoa, whoa, did you see that a pat on the whoa, whoa, did you see that a pat on the back darling?
I love you and pulls it back. Darling, I love you and pulls it back. Darling, I love you and pulls it back and she was a little bit concerned back and she was a little bit concerned back and she was a little bit concerned there, but he was angry and then a second there, but he was angry. And then a second there, but he was angry and then a second time they showed him and he was angry time, they showed him and he was angry time, they showed him and he was angry.
And you know what honestly he made a big and you know what honestly he made a big and you know what honestly he made a big mistake because we have the best mistake because we have the best mistake because we have the best movement of what we Have far more people movement of what we have far more people movement of what we have far more people that anybody we have the most important that anybody we have the most important that anybody we have the most important.
I tell people Bill O'Reilly said the - I tell people Bill O'Reilly said the - I tell people Bill O'Reilly said the greatest thing, greatest thing, greatest thing, phenomena he's ever seen in politics, us, phenomena he's ever seen in politics, us, phenomena he's ever seen in politics us. All of it, all of us, you, you, you, you, you all of it, all of us, you, you, you, you, you all of it, all of us, you, you, you, you, you all the people outside man, that people, all the people outside man, that people, all the People outside man that people lined up in the driveway all the way up, lined up in the driveway all the way up, lined up in the driveway all the way up.
But - but this is one of the great, but - but this is one of the great, but - but this is one of the great movements in the history of our country movements in the history of our country movements in the history of our country. Our movement is much better than Bernie, our movement is much better than Bernie.
Our movement is much better than Bernie, but I'll tell you where Bernie blew it, but I'll tell you where Bernie blew it. But I'll tell you where Bernie blew it. He sold his soul to the devil. He did he. He sold his soul to the devil. He did he. He sold his soul to the devil he did. He had a great thing.
I was so surprised had a great thing. I was so surprised had a great thing. I was so surprised because he seemed like a tough guy. He because he seemed like a tough guy. He because he seemed like a tough guy, he was like tough, tough, tough, tough and was like tough, tough, tough, tough. And was like tough, tough, tough, tough and then in the end he folded and I said then in the end he folded and I said then in the end he folded and I said yesterday and it's true he wanted to go yesterday and it's true.
He wanted to go yesterday and it's true he wanted to go home, he wanted to go to sleep, okay. I home he wanted to go to sleep. Okay. I home he wanted to go to sleep. Okay. I sort away but you know had he not folded sort away, but you know, had he not folded sort away, but you know, had he not folded and his people haven't folded because and his people haven't folded because and his people haven't folded because his people were Angry now just to show his people were angry now just to show his people were angry now just to show you how unfair it is, if that would have you how unfair it is, if that would have you how unfair it is, if that would have happened In the Republican convention happened in the Republican convention happened in the Republican convention, they would have said catastrophic, they would have said catastrophic, they would have said catastrophic evening, people are screaming, did you see evening people are screaming, did you see evening people are screaming, did you See when they had the moment of silence for when they had the moment of silence for when they had the moment of silence for the police.
And by the way, the only the police and by the way, the only the police. And by the way, the only reason the police were up on that stage, reason the police were up on that stage. Reason the police were up on that stage on the fourth night was because I was on the fourth night was because I was on the fourth night was because I was complaining, they don't have any police complaining.
They don't have any police complaining. They don't have any police up there, right? They put the police up up there, right? They put the police up up there, right? They put the police up because they were getting a lot of heat because they were getting a lot of heat because they were getting a lot of heat.
But they don't mean it the difference is, but they don't mean it. The difference is, but they don't mean it. The difference is, I mean, it okay, we're gonna be law. And I mean it okay, we're gonna be law. And I mean it okay, we're gonna be law and order. And I mean, it - we're gonna be great, but did you see what happened when they - but did you see what happened when they - but did you see what happened when they had the moment of silence for the police?
Had the moment of silence for the police? Had the moment of silence for the police, tough situation, tough situation, tough situation, tough situation, not good, not good and tough situation, not good, not good and tough situation, not good, not good. And then you have Bernie and he makes the - then you have Bernie and he makes the - then you have Bernie and he makes the deal and then they pick a vice president deal and then they pick a vice president deal and then they pick a vice president.
That's exactly the opposite. Apparently, that's exactly the opposite. Apparently. That's exactly the opposite apparently. Okay. Okay. Okay. He believes in TPP, which is a disaster he believes in TPP, which is a disaster he believes in TPP, which is a disaster by the way will never approve it. They'll, by the way, will never approve it.
They'll, by the way, will never approve it. They'll approve it. How about where terry approve it, how about where terry approve it, how about where terry mcauliffe, the governor of virginia comes mcauliffe. The governor of virginia comes mcauliffe. The governor of virginia comes out and said, don't worry out and said, don't worry out and said, don't worry, Hillary will approve it after the Hillary will approve it after the Hillary will approve it after the election.
See that's the way it is and it election see that's the way it is and it election see that's the way it is. And it will take your jobs away almost as bad will take your jobs away almost as bad will take your jobs away almost as bad as NAFTA, which was approved by Bill as NAFTA, which was approved by Bill as NAFTA, which was approved by Bill Clinton, right?
NAFTA a disaster NAFTA has Clinton, right, NAFTA, a disaster, NAFTA has Clinton, right NAFTA, a disaster. NAFTA has cleaned out. So many states in this cleaned out. So many states in this cleaned out. So many states in this country. I Love New York State, you look country, I Love New York State, you look country, I Love New York State, you look at New York State, you look at New at New York State, you look at New at New York State, you look at New England, you Look at Pennsylvania, what England, you look at, Pennsylvania, what England, you look at, Pennsylvania, what NAFTA has done to Pennsylvania where NAFTA has done to Pennsylvania where NAFTA has done to Pennsylvania, where these companies move to Mexico, a friend.
These companies move to Mexico, a friend. These companies move to Mexico, a friend of mine is a builder. He builds plants of mine is a builder, he builds plants of mine is a builder, he builds plants, plants if you told him to build an plants, if you told him to build an plants. If you told him to build an apartment, he wouldn't know where to apartment.
He wouldn't know where to apartment. He wouldn't know where to begin. He builds plants, big, big plans, one begin, he builds plants, big, big plans, one begin, he builds plants, big, big plans. One of the biggest - and he maybe I'll use of the biggest and he maybe I'll use of the biggest and he maybe I'll use them to build a wall, what a great idea them to build a wall, what a great idea them to build a wall.
What a great idea get a lot of smart people, somebody get a lot of smart people, somebody get a lot of smart people, somebody shouts out, let him build a wall. We will shouts out, let him build a wall. We will shouts out let him build a wall. We will. We have smart people, we have smart people, we have smart people, but this guy bills big, big plans you but this guy bills big, big plans you.
But this guy bills big, big plans. You don't want a mobile plants and computer don't want a mobile plants and computer don't want a mobile plants and computer technology plants. That's what he bills technology plants, that's what he bills technology plants, that's what he bills bills, Birds, bills, Birds, bills Birds.
One of the biggest, maybe the biggest one, one of the biggest, maybe the biggest one, one of the biggest, maybe the biggest one of the bigger. And he started up building of the bigger and he started up building of the bigger and he started up building in the United States years ago and it in the United States years ago and it in the United States years ago.
And it bill plants in the United States, so I bill plants in the United States, so I bill plants in the United States. So I see him the other day and I say how's it, see him the other day and I say how's it see him. The other day and I say how's it going, good going good, going good. How's business? Unbelievable.
I said great. How's business? Unbelievable. I said great. How's business? Unbelievable. I said great. I thought that was good for the United. I thought that was good for the United. I thought that was good for the United States. I said how many plants you're States. I said how many plants you're States.
I said how many plants you're building. Many, he said you've got to see building many. He said you've got to see building many. He said you've got to see what's happening in Mexico now by the - what's happening in Mexico now by the - what's happening in Mexico. Now by the way, this guy is better than a consultant way.
This guy is better than a consultant way. This guy is better than a consultant if I hire a consultant to hire some guy, if I hire a consultant to hire some guy, if I hire a consultant to hire some guy that you know that's terrible that you know that's terrible that you know that's terrible To tell me what's happening right now to tell me what's happening right now to tell me what's happening right now, charge a million bucks, they'll give you charge a million bucks, they'll give you charge a million bucks.
They'll give you a report in seven months from now. They a report in seven months from now, they a report in seven months from now they have to take a long time. Otherwise they have to take a long time. Otherwise they have to take a long time. Otherwise they can't charge as much. This guy tells me can't charge as much this guy tells me can't charge as much.
This guy tells me in two minutes in two minutes in two minutes. In one minute I learned better about in one minute, I learned better about in one minute I learned better about what's happening from him, talking to him, what's happening from him, talking to him, what's happening from him, talking to him about houses business that I can learn About houses business that I can learn about houses business that I can learn from some phony consultant, because if he from some phony consultant, because if he from some phony consultant, because if he was any good, he would have been.
The one was any good. He would have been - the one was any good, he would have been the one building two plans, right? You know, so. So building two plans, right, you know, so, so building two plans, right, you know, so so an amazing thing, an amazing thing. So I - an amazing thing, an amazing thing, so I - an amazing thing, an amazing thing.
So I said so what's going on because you said so what's going on because you said so what's going on because you better see Mexico, it's the eighth wonder better see Mexico, it's the eighth wonder better see Mexico, it's the eighth wonder of the world. He said we are building the of the world. He said we are building the of the world.
He said we are building the biggest, the most sophisticated, the most biggest, the most sophisticated, the most biggest, the most sophisticated, the most incredible plants all over Mexico. I say incredible plants all over Mexico, I say incredible plants all over Mexico. I say what about the United States, not so good.
What about the United States, not so good. What about the United States, not so good, like who cares and actually he'd much like who cares and actually he'd much like who cares and actually he'd much rather build in the United States, but rather build in the United States, but rather build in the United States.
But not so good, he said not so good and I not so good, he said not so good and I not so good, he said not so good. And I said what does that mean? He said, oh said, what does that mean? He said, oh, said, what does that mean? He said, oh, we're doing a little work, but not much. We're doing a little work, but not much.
We're doing a little work, but not much. But Donald, you have to see Mexico, I said, but Donald you have to see Mexico I said, but Donald you have to see Mexico, I said no, thanks, but he goes, he goes, he goes. No. Thanks, but he goes, he goes, he goes. No. Thanks. But he goes, he goes, he goes what we're doing there is incredible how what we're doing there is incredible how what we're doing there is incredible, how stupid are we folks, how stupid away our stupid are we folks how stupid away our stupid are we folks, how Stupid away, our companies are moving to Mexico and other companies are moving to Mexico and other companies are moving to Mexico and other places while crooked Hillary Clinton places while crooked Hillary Clinton places while crooked Hillary Clinton, who's crooked is a three dollar bill, who's crooked is A three dollar bill who's crooked is a three dollar bill, while crooked Hillary Clinton sits there.
While crooked Hillary Clinton sits there. While crooked Hillary Clinton sits there and makes up stories, Donald Trump didn't and makes up stories. Donald Trump didn't and makes up stories. Donald Trump didn't do well in his campaign. I said I just do well in his campaign. I said I just do well in his campaign.
I said I just beat 18 people or 17, but wouldn't Donald beat 18 people or 17, but wouldn't Donald beat 18 people or 17, but wouldn't Donald Trump? No, no, it was written by all Trump. No, no, it was written by all Trump. No, no. It was written by all written by it's what Politico I can't written by. It's what Politico I can't written by.
It's what Politico. I can't believe I'm talking about Politico believe I'm talking about Politico believe I'm talking about Politico because Politico is terrible to me. But because Politico is terrible to me, but because Politico is terrible to me, but Politico run all cliches not good, ok, but Politico run all cliches not good, ok, but Politico run all cliches not good.
Ok, but somebody wrote it, she probably didn't. Somebody wrote it, she probably didn't. Somebody wrote it, she probably didn't notice it, but I'm being recognized for notice it. But I'm being recognized for notice it. But I'm being recognized for having done one of the most legendary, having done one of the most legendary, having done one of the most legendary campaigns in the history of politics in campaigns, in the history of politics, in campaigns, in the history of politics in this country.
And she puts in her her this country and she puts in her her this country and she puts in her her thing right after the tweet. If somebody thing right after the tweet, if somebody thing right after the tweet, if somebody tweets, she gets upset, I get upset I tweets, she gets upset. I get upset I tweets, she gets upset.
I get upset. I don't get her say, I didn't get upset, don't get her say I didn't get upset, don't get her say I didn't get upset. Somebody wrote that you know was a nice - somebody wrote that you know was a nice - somebody wrote that you know was a nice little sound by right. They just little sound by right, they just little sound by right.
They just announced I have over 22 million between announced, I have over 22 million between announced, I have over 22 million between Twitter and Facebook, 22 million people, Twitter and Facebook, 22 million people, Twitter and Facebook, 22 million people. That's like I don't get a percent if that's like I don't get a percent if that's like I don't get a percent.
If somebody tweets, I do what I do, who cares somebody tweets, I do what I do, who cares somebody tweets. I do what I do, who cares. I think I'll tell you, I think I have the - I think I'll tell you, I think I have the - I think I'll tell you, I think I have the best temperament or certainly one of the best temperament or certainly one of the best temperament or certainly one Of the best temperaments of anybody that's ever best temperaments of anybody that's ever best temperaments of anybody that's ever run for the office of president ever run for the office of president ever run for the office of president ever because I have a winning temperament I because I have a winning temperament I because I have a winning temperament.
I know how to win because my whole life know how to win because my whole life know how to win because my whole life, I've been winning my whole life. I've - I've been winning my whole life, I've - I've been winning my whole life, I've been winning and I think I have one of been winning and I think I have one of been winning and I think I have one of the best temperament cuz we have to.
The best temperament cuz we have to the best temperament cuz we have to start winning for us. We don't win, start winning for us. We don't win, start winning for us. We don't win anywhere. We can't beat Isis, we can't anywhere. We can't beat Isis. We can't anywhere, we can't beat Isis, we can't beat China in trade and then they go and beat China in trade and then they go and beat China in trade and then they go and build this massive fort in the middle of build this massive fort in The middle of build this massive fort in the middle of the South China Sea, we're not supposed the South China Sea, we're not supposed the South China Sea, we're not supposed to be doing.
They only do it because they to be doing - they only do it because they to be doing - they only do it because they don't respect us. So they take our money, don't respect us. So they take our money, don't respect us. So they take our money, they take our jobs, they take everything, they take our jobs, they take everything, they take our jobs, they take everything, they sell us, the products, no tax come on, they sell us the products, no tax come on, they sell us the products.
No tax come on in our manufacturers want to sell to in our manufacturers want to sell to in our manufacturers want to sell to China, they can't get in and if they ever China they can't get in and if they ever China they can't get in. And if they ever do get in, they have to pay a tax. It's so do get in, they have to pay a tax.
It's so do get in, they have to pay a tax, it's so high or they have to build their plants high or they have to build their plants high or they have to build their plants over there and they don't even want him over there. And they don't even want him over there and they don't even want him to do that honestly, friend of mine great to do that honestly friend of mine, great to do that.
Honestly friend of mine great. He said they said, well, we don't want - he said they said, well, we don't want - he said they said, well, we don't want your product and then they gave a tax your product and then they gave a tax your product and then they gave a tax rate Which I won't even say because it's rate, which I won't even say because it's rate, which I won't even say because it's so high, nobody's gonna believe it so high, nobody's gonna believe it so high, nobody's gonna believe it.
But then they said build your plant over but then they said build your plant over, but then they said build your plant over here. But we don't even want you to we here, but we don't even want you to we here. But we don't even want you to - we don't even want - they don't even want us, don't even want - they don't even want us, don't even want - they don't even want us there, okay, didn't even want us to build there.
Okay, didn't even want us to build there. Okay, didn't even want us to build a Boeing. They ordered 300 Jets and they a Boeing, they ordered 300 Jets and they a Boeing, they ordered 300 Jets. And they made Boeing build massive plants and made Boeing build massive plants and made Boeing build massive plants and watch what happens in Seattle and watch.
Watch what happens in Seattle and watch watch what happens in Seattle and watch what happens in a number of years when what happens in a number of years when what happens in a number of years when those plants are built, watch what those plants are built, watch What those plants are built, watch what happens in South Carolina where I love happens in South Carolina where I love happens in South Carolina where I love those people in south, those people in south those people in south lonna, they gave me the biggest victory lonna.
They gave me the biggest victory lonna. They gave me the biggest victory. Remember, I supposed to lose - I was remember I supposed to lose, I was remember I supposed to lose - I was supposed to lose highly evangelical, but supposed to lose highly evangelical, but supposed to lose highly evangelical. But the evangelicals love me highly.
The evangelicals love me highly. The evangelicals love me highly evangelical, I won with evangelicals, evangelical. I won with evangelicals, evangelical. I won with evangelicals, highly military, South Carolina, big highly military, South Carolina, big highly military, South Carolina, big military, Colorado, big military, big military, Colorado, big military, big military, Colorado, big military, big villified, big.
And I went in and you villified big and I went in and you villified big and I went in and you watch what they do, watch what they do, watch what they do. South Carolina built big Boeing plants, South Carolina built big Boeing plants, South Carolina built big Boeing plants. They have a big, big plant, beautiful.
I - they have a big, big plant, beautiful. I - they have a big, big plant, beautiful. I love group seeing it. I love seeing this love group seeing it. I love seeing this love group seeing it. I love seeing this now to actually move part of their now to actually move part of their now to actually move part of their operation from Seattle, Seattle, big plans operation from Seattle, Seattle, big plans operation from Seattle, Seattle, big plans.
So they think it's good new plants, so they think it's good new plants. So they think it's good new plants, everything good, great people, great labor, everything, good, great people, great labor, everything good, great people, great labor force, but China is forcing them to build force. But China is forcing them to build force, but China is forcing them to build plants in China.
Now when China devalues plants in China now when China devalues plants in China now when China devalues its currency and when Boeing and a its currency and when Boeing and a its currency and when Boeing and a number of years, just remember I said it number of Years just remember I said it number of years, just remember I said it, oh, don't worry if I'm president it won't - oh, don't worry.
If I'm president it won't. Oh, don't worry. If I'm president it won't happen, happen happen. They want a president. If I'm president, they want a president, if I'm president, they want a president. If I'm president, Boeing will be very happy. Believe me, Boeing will be very happy. Believe me, Boeing will be very happy.
Believe me because it won't, but they may be unhappy because it won't. But they may be unhappy because it won't, but they may be unhappy that they built the plant in China, but that they built the plant in China, but that they built the plant in China. But they're not gonna have to worry about. They're not gonna have to worry about, they're not gonna have to worry about South Carolina and Seattle, but remember South Carolina and Seattle, but remember South Carolina and Seattle.
But remember I said it just in case we don't make it. I said it just in case we don't make it, I said it just in case we don't make it because you people get lazy and don't because you people get lazy and don't because you people get lazy and don't vote. Okay, vote. Okay, vote. Okay. Colorado is very important, very Colorado is very important, very Colorado is very important, very important.
So just remember I said it important. So just remember I said it important. So just remember, I said it when that plants finished, when they - when that plants finished, when they - when that plants finished, when they start operating and when China does a start operating and when China does a start operating and when China does a massive devaluation of its Currency and massive devaluation of its currency and massive devaluation of its currency.
And when you go and order your brand-new jet, when you go and order your brand-new jet, when you go and order your brand-new jet liners for all of the different airlines liners for all of the different airlines liners for all of the different airlines. And when they find out that the planes and when they find out that the planes and when they find out that the planes are going to be made in China, not in - are going to be made in China, not in - are going to be made in China.
Not in South Carolina and not in Seattle, not in South Carolina and not in Seattle, not in South Carolina and not in Seattle, not in this country. This country, this country because we have people that are because we have people that are because we have people that are incompetent running our country when you incompetent running our country, when you incompetent running our country, when you see that.
And I hope you don't see that - see that and I hope you don't see that - see that. And I hope you don't see that because if you see that, that means that because if you see that, that means that because if you see that, that means that I didn't win and that won't be good that I didn't win and that won't be good.
That I didn't win and that won't be good, that won't be good. So here's the story. Folks won't be good. So here's the story. Folks won't be good. So here's the story. Folks. When you see the - when you see the - when you see the - if you see that it'll be a sad day, then if you see that it'll be a sad day.
Then if you see that it'll be a sad day. Then I told the voting folks I said to Boeing, I told the voting folks I said to Boeing, I told the voting folks I said to Boeing, I said, you know you have a big, I said, you know you have a big, I said you know, you Have a big investment, what happens if the plant investment, what happens if the plant investment, what happens if the plant that they're being forced to build in that they're being forced to build in that they're being forced to build in China becomes much more active.
And you, China becomes much more active and you - China becomes much more active and you start making all of your planes there. Oh, start making all of your planes there? Oh, start making all of your planes there? Oh, well, I don't think that will ever happen. Well, I don't think that will ever happen.
Well, I don't think that will ever happen. Watch.watch we're dealing with grand watch.watch. We're dealing with grand watch.watch. We're dealing with grand masters of currency manipulation, one of masters of currency manipulation, one of masters of currency manipulation. One of the reasons among many that I'm against the reasons among many that I'm against the reasons among many that I'm against trans-pacific partnership is they don't trans-pacific partnership is - they don't trans-pacific partnership is - they don't cover currency manipulation and in fact cover currency manipulation.
And in fact cover currency manipulation and in fact one of my opponents in politics fought one of my opponents in politics fought one of my opponents in politics fought very, very hard that no currency very, very hard that no currency very, very hard that no currency manipulation Be mentioned in the manipulation be mentioned in the manipulation be mentioned in the documents.
This is a u.s. politician, I documents this is a u.s. politician. I documents this is a u.s. politician. I won't mention the name. I want me, I won't mention the name. I want me - I won't mention the name, I want me I should, but I want the people, you know what call Washington, the people, you know what call Washington, the people, you know what call Washington, they'll tell you they didn't want.
They'll tell you they didn't want. They'll tell you they didn't want currency manipulation mention currency, currency manipulation mention, currency, currency manipulation mention currency manipulation is the single biggest tool manipulation is the single biggest tool manipulation is the single biggest tool that foreign governments use to beat us that foreign governments use to beat Us that foreign governments use to beat us and to destroy our companies and to - and to destroy our companies and to - and to destroy our companies and to destroy our trade and to get rich and to destroy our trade and to get rich and to destroy our Trade and to get rich and to rebuild their countries as we suffer, rebuild their countries as we suffer, rebuild their countries as we suffer, we're like a third-world country.
We have - we're like a third-world country. We have - we're like a third-world country. We have rotten airports. We have airports, you go rotten airports, we have airports, you go rotten airports, we have airports, you go over to Dubai, you go over to places in over to Dubai. You go over to places in over to Dubai.
You go over to places in China, you go over to other places in the China, you go over to other places in the China, you go over to other places in the Middle East, you'll see airports, the Middle East, you'll see airports, the Middle East, you'll see Airports, the likes of which you've never seen, I went likes of which you've never seen.
I went likes of which you've never seen. I went to Dubai number of years ago and they to Dubai number of years ago and they to Dubai number of years ago. And they were treating me great, I mean it was - were treating me great. I mean it was were treating me great. I mean it was great, great visit, unbelievable what great, great visit, unbelievable, what great, great visit, unbelievable, what what's happened there.
But they have an - what's happened there, but they have an - what's happened there, but they have an airport that's so unbelievable. So the airport, that's so unbelievable. So the airport, that's so unbelievable. So the head of the airline is showing me around head of the airline is showing me around head of the airline is showing me around and it's really good and I'm looking at - and it's really good and I'm looking at - and it's really good.
And I'm looking at the terminal, I say this is one of the - the terminal, I say this is one of the - the terminal, I say this is one of the most beaut. I'm good. I mean, I'm - I'm a - I'm most beaut I'm good. I mean, I'm - I'm a - I'm most beaut I'm good. I mean, I'm - I'm a - I'm a really good builder.
I build under a really good builder. I build under a really good builder. I build under budget and ahead of schedule by the way, budget and ahead of schedule by the way, budget and ahead of schedule. By the way, I had a meeting with your great - I had a meeting with your great - I had a meeting with your great newspaper and I really liked the newspaper and I really liked the newspaper and I really liked the editorial board of that newspaper.
Okay, editorial board of that newspaper, okay. Editorial board of that newspaper, okay. You know, I'm talking about the - these are, you know, I'm talking about the - these are, you know, I'm talking about the - these are great people and they would tell me great people and they would tell me great people and they would tell me there's a Veterans Administration.
There's a Veterans Administration, there's a Veterans Administration Hospital that had a 1.2 billion dollar Hospital that had a 1.2 billion dollar Hospital that had a 1.2 billion dollar cost overrun in this area. I don't think cost overrun in this area. I don't think cost overrun in this area. I don't think of that - think of this, I'm building a of that.
Think of this, I'm building a of that. Think of this, I'm building a hotel in Washington and I'm under budget hotel in Washington and I'm under budget hotel in Washington and I'm under budget and ahead of schedule by one year. Think and ahead of schedule by one year, think and ahead of schedule by one year.
Think of it and it's peanuts compared to 1.2 of it and it's peanuts compared to 1.2 of it and it's peanuts compared to 1.2 billion that - what is this, that's just a billion that - what is this, that's just a billion that what is this, that's just a Cost overrun and this is happening all cost overrun and this is happening all cost overrun and this is happening all over the country.
When you build a road over the country, when you build a road over the country, when you build a road when you build an airport, some of the - when you build an airport, some of the - when you build an airport, some of the richest people in this Country are richest people in this country are richest people in this country are people that can't even read or write people that can't even read or write people that can't even read or write they're called friends of mine.
They're called friends of mine. They're called friends of mine contractors. They might not read or write contractors. They might not read or write contractors. They might not read or write, but they're a lot smarter than the guys. But they're a lot smarter than the guys. But they're a lot smarter than the guys coming out of Harvard.
I want to tell you coming out of Harvard, I want to tell you coming out of Harvard, I want to tell you they can take them, they can take them, they can take them. They can take them, they can take them, they can take them and wrap them around there and wrap them around there and wrap them around there.
Though I did an editorial board meeting though, I did an editorial board meeting though I did an editorial board meeting a little while ago. I really liked that a little while ago. I really liked that a little while ago. I really liked that group. Of course, if they write badly group, of course, if they write badly group, of course, if they write badly about me, I'll take it back.
Okay, well about me, I'll take it back. Okay, well about me, I'll take it back. Okay, well, we'll be back here again many times you, we'll be back here again many times you. We'll be back here again many times you get, you'll get so sick of me and I'll get - you'll get so sick of me and I'll get - you'll get so sick of me and I'll tell you and I'll tell you then I just tell you and I'll tell You then I just tell you and I'll tell you then, I just like that group ever though, I like them like that group ever though.
I like them like that group ever though, I like them and smart people. But they're telling me and smart people. But they're telling me and smart people, but they're telling me about a hospital built in the air you about a hospital built in the air, you about a hospital built in the air. You know, you all know what I'm talking about, know, you all know what I'm talking about, know, you all know what I'm talking about 1.2 billion, I said, Wow, 1.2 billion, I said, Wow, 1.2 billion.
I said, Wow, I thought I didn't hear the original. I thought I didn't hear the original, I thought I didn't hear the original incident cost over. I said, wow, that's a incident cost over I said, wow, that's a incident cost over I said, wow, that's a lot of money for a hospital. How big is lot of money for a hospital, how big is lot of money for a hospital, how big is it?
They said no, no, no, that's not the it, they said no, no, no, that's not the it, they said no, no, no, that's not the core. So that's just the cost overrun core. So that's just the cost overrun core. So that's just the cost overrun. Think of what we could do if we had real think of what we could do if we had real think of what we could do if we had real people running our government, ok, this people running our government ok, this people running our government ok.
This one. There's 1.2 billion and I have one, there's 1.2 billion and I have one, there's 1.2 billion and I have friends we know how to build ahead of friends. We know how to build ahead of friends. We know how to build ahead of schedule. We build, we build buildings schedule, we build, we build buildings, schedule, we build, we build buildings, they come in under budget, they come in, they come in under budget, they come in, they come in under budget, they come in heads, I have friends, they can do this If heads I have friends, they can do this if heads I have friends, they can do this.
If one of the people that I know some New - one of the people that I know some New - one of the people that I know some New York killer builder or somebody built York killer builder or somebody built York killer builder or somebody built that building. It would have been up two that building. It would have been up two that building it would have been up two years ago.
It would have been finished years ago. It would have been finished years ago. It would have been finished like a year after it started. It's not like a year after it started. It's not like a year after it started. It's not even a tall building. That's easy. But even a tall building, that's easy. But even a tall building, that's easy.
But because it takes longer to build the - because it takes longer to build the - because it takes longer to build, the tall height means language. So remember, tall height means language. So remember tall height means language. So remember that ok, but but one of my friends will that ok but but one of my friends will that ok but but one of my friends will be told me the thing would have been be told me the thing would have been be told me the Thing would have been thrown up so fast and it would have been thrown up so fast and it would have been thrown up so fast and it would have been better, better than it is now, tell you a better, better than it is now, tell you a Better better than it is now tell you a little quick story I got called before little quick story, I got called before little quick story I got called before the United Nations, they - I heard that the United Nations, they - I heard that the United Nations, they I Heard that we're building an extension to the - we're building an extension to the - we're building an extension to the United Nations in New York, number of United Nations in New York, number of United Nations in New York number of years ago.
And Jeff Sessions is such an years ago and Jeff Sessions is such an years ago and Jeff Sessions is such an amazing man and he's script general, he amazing man and he's script general, he amazing man and he's script general. He was the first senator to endorse. Donald was the first senator to endorse. Donald was the first senator to endorse Donald Trump.
First, really major political guy Trump first really major political guy Trump first really major political guy. It's very smart guy, but they have - I - it's very smart guy, but they have - I - it's very smart guy, but they have - I built a building across the street like built a building across the street like built a building across the street like for 320 million dollars.
And it's a very - for 320 million dollars and it's a very - for 320 million dollars, and it's a very tall building like around 90 storeys tall building like around 90 storeys tall building like around 90 storeys tall, tall, tall. Okay, let's talk much taller than the - okay, let's talk much taller than the - okay, let's talk much taller than the United Nations and then it was - and I United Nations and then it was - and I United Nations and then it was - and I built it for I Think it was 325 million built it for I think it was 325 million built it for I think it was 325 million dollars, all right.
Condominium, it's dollars, all right. Condominium, it's dollars, all right. Condominium, it's called Trump World Tower, great building called Trump World Tower, great building called Trump World Tower, great building, beautiful, really be all glass, it's beautiful, really be all glass, it's beautiful, really be all glass, it's beautiful.
Herbert mousse shop at the New beautiful Herbert mousse shop at the New beautiful Herbert mousse shop at the New York Times York Times York Times. The architectural critic prior to the architectural critic prior to the architectural critic prior to passing away gave it a great review. So passing away, gave it a great review, so passing away, gave it a great review.
So we built this building and it's - we built this building and it's - we built this building and it's announced and I get a call from I think announced and I get a call from I think announced and I get a call from I think it was the Swedish ambassador, but one of it was the Swedish ambassador, but one of it was the Swedish ambassador, but one of the ambassador's, very good man and he the ambassador's very good man and he the ambassador's very good man.
And he said, mr. Trump um with the United said, mr. Trump um with the United said, mr. Trump um with the United Nations, I'm the ambassador again, I think Nations, I'm the ambassador again, I think Nations, I'm the ambassador again, I think it was sweet. It was a while ago, he said it was sweet, it was a while ago, he said it was sweet.
It was a while ago. He said, I don't understand something. We're - I don't understand something. We're - I don't understand something we're talking about doing an expansion of the - talking about doing an expansion of the - talking about doing an expansion of the United Nations, not a big deal. And it's United Nations, not a big deal.
And it's United Nations, not a big deal. And it's going to cost 1.5 billion dollars. I read going to cost 1.5 billion dollars. I read going to cost 1.5 billion dollars. I read that you're building which is three that you're building, which is three that you're building, which is three times taller or more cost.
Three hundred times taller or more cost three hundred times taller or more cost three hundred and twenty five million dollars. Is that and twenty five million dollars, is that and twenty five million dollars, is that possible or is that a mistake? I said possible or is that a mistake? I said possible or is that a mistake?
I said totally possible mr. ambassador, they totally possible mr. ambassador. They totally possible mr. ambassador, they said why he said to me he was good. He said why he said to me he was good. He said why he said to me he was good, he was good man, but he knew nothing about was good man. But he knew nothing about was good man, but he knew nothing about this business.
He said why is it that this business he said why is it that this business he said why is it that that cost so much less than just a that cost so much less than just a that cost so much less than just a simple expansion of The United Nations simple expansion of the United Nations simple expansion of the United Nations building, I said two reasons, corruption building, I said two reasons, corruption building, I said two reasons, corruption, corruption is number one, Oh, is no more corruption is number one, Oh, is no more Corruption is number one, Oh, is no more corruption number one and incompetence corruption number one and incompetence corruption number one and incompetence number two extra two reasons, first, so I number two extra two reasons.
First, so I number two extra two reasons. First, so I then get a call and I'm brought before then get a call. And I'm brought before then get a call. And I'm brought before the United States Senate to tell the, the United States Senate to tell the, the United States Senate to tell the people. In the Senate, because you know people in the Senate because you know people in the Senate because you know we're funding the United Nations, that's we're funding the United Nations, that's we're funding the United Nations.
That's another beauty. We fund NATO. We fund another beauty. We fund NATO, we fund another beauty, we fund NATO, we fund Japan, we fund Germany, we fund Saudi Japan, we fund Germany, we fund Saudi Japan. We fund Germany, we fund Saudi Arabia, we fund Saudi Arabia. We pay rent Arabia, we fund Saudi Arabia.
We pay rent Arabia, we fund Saudi Arabia, we pay rent for our base in Saudi riyal, it's pay for our base in Saudi riyal, it's pay for our base in Saudi riyal, it's pay rent so we can protect them, we'll pay rent so we can protect them. We'll pay rent so we can protect them. We'll pay rent, rent, rent, they want more rent, so we can protect, they want more rent so we can protect, they want more rent so we can protect them, right.
So we fund Saudi Arabia, we them, right. So we fund Saudi Arabia, we them, right? So we fund Saudi Arabia, we fund South Korea. We have 28,000 soldiers fund, South Korea. We have 28,000 soldiers fund, South Korea. We have 28,000 soldiers on the line. We're real. We're real on the line. We're real. We're real on the line, we're real, we're real geniuses.
I'll tell you, so I get called geniuses. I'll tell you, so I get called geniuses. I'll tell you. So I get called before the Senate and they wanted to before the Senate and they wanted to before the Senate and they wanted to know and I said, look, here's the story. I know and I said, look, here's the story.
I know and I said, look, here's the story I then go and I meet the head of the - then go and I meet the head of the - then go and I meet the head of the United Nations. I think it was Kofi Anan, United Nations. I think it was Kofi Anan, United Nations, I think it was Kofi Anan at that time, Kofi Annan and we sit in at that time Kofi Annan and we sit in at that time Kofi Annan and we sit in these two chairs and I'm talking to him These two chairs and I'm talking to him these two chairs and I'm talking to him all of a sudden the curtain opens up and all of a sudden the curtain opens up and all of a sudden the curtain opens up and there were massive press taking a There were massive press taking a - there were massive press taking a picture that's the only one he didn't picture.
That's the only one he didn't picture. That's the only one he didn't care what the thing cost and then the care what the thing cost and then the care what the thing cost and then the curtain closed, I said okay. So it was at curtain closed, I said, okay. So it was at curtain closed, I said, okay. So it was at that time 1.5 that time 1.5 that time 1.5 billion dollars and they said to me billion dollars and they said to me billion dollars.
And they said to me, would you like to meet the man in charge? Would you like to meet the man in charge? Would you like to meet the man in charge of construction? I said I would because of construction I said I would because of construction. I said I would because how can he spend that much money? I mean, how can he spend that much money?
I mean, how can he spend that much money? I mean, you know, he's gonna teach me there's no - you know, he's gonna teach me, there's no - you know, he's gonna teach me there's no way and this guy comes in who didn't way - and this guy comes in who didn't way - and this guy Comes in who didn't know much, although he may have known know much, although he may have known know much, although he may have known much more than we all think.
Okay. So I much more than we all think, okay? So I much more than we all think. Okay, so I said, what kind of scheme are you using said, what kind of scheme are you using said, what kind of scheme are you using? Do you have a boiler plant or are you - do you have a boiler plant or are you - do you have a boiler plant?
Or are you using New York steam which is different using New York steam, which is different using New York steam, which is different form of energy? Because I don't know I form of energy because I don't know I form of energy because I don't know. I see women, you're in charge of the new see women, you're in charge of the new see women, you're in charge of the new construction of the building.
You don't construction of the building, you don't construction of the building, you don't know what kind of steam, you don't know, know what kind of steam, you don't know, know what kind of steam, you don't know what kind of a plant an energy plant, what kind of A plant, an energy plant, what kind of a plant an energy plant you're using, what are you doing on the - you're using, what are you doing on the - you're using, what are you doing on the curtain wall?
Honestly, mr. cha, I said are curtain wall. Honestly, mr. cha I said are curtain wall honestly, mr. cha, I said, are you going, you going, you going, are you emptying the building, are you - are you emptying the building? Are you - are you emptying the building? Are you gonna do it by floor? I don't know, I gonna do it by floor.
I don't know. I gonna do it by floor. I don't know. I haven't - this is a guy charge. Okay, so he haven't - this is a guy charge. Okay. So he haven't - this is a guy charge. Okay. So he was either really bad or really corrupt was either really bad or really corrupt was either really bad or really corrupt.
So that was yen. So I offered to do it. So that was yen. So I offered to do it. So that was yen. So I offered to do it for - I think it was like five, five for I think it was like five, five for I think it was like five, five hundred million dollars. They said it was hundred million dollars. They said it was hundred million dollars.
They said it was a binge, so I could save like a billion a binge. So I could save like a billion a binge. So I could save like a billion dollars they said, but what will the dollars they said, but what will the dollars they said. But what will the difference be? I'll say, I tell you what difference be.
I'll say, I tell you what difference be. I'll say, I tell you what the difference would be. Number one, it'll - the difference would be number one, it'll - the difference would be, number one, it'll be a much higher quality. Number two will be a much higher quality; number two will be a much higher quality.
Number two will use marble instead of linoleum and use marble. Instead of linoleum and use marble instead of linoleum and number three, you don't have to move number three. You don't have to move number three. You don't have to move everybody out of the building and then everybody out of the building and then everybody out of the building and then come back two years later or whatever come back two years later or whatever come back two years later or whatever.
And number four, your numbers not a - and number four, your numbers not a - and number four, your numbers, not a billion five, it's gonna be many times billion, five, it's gonna be many times billion, five, it's gonna be many times. Then I was right about everything that then I was right about everything that then I was right about everything that was maybe eight, nine years ago.
The was maybe eight, nine years ago, the was maybe eight, nine years ago. The building cost, a fortune building cost, a fortune building cost a fortune, somebody got so much we pay for so much, somebody got so much we pay for so much, somebody got so much we pay for so much of the United Nations. And by the way of the United Nations and by the way of the United Nations - and by the way, here's another one I talk about NATO. Here's another one I talk about NATO. Here's another one I talk about NATO. So five countries out of 28 pay their.
So five countries out of 28 pay their - so five countries out of 28 pay their way the rest of them now and the way the rest of them now and the way the rest of them now and the question was asked if they're attacked question was asked. If they're attacked, question was asked if they're attacked, if they're attacked, will the United - if they're attacked, will the United - if they're attacked, will the United States come to their rescue?
Meaning one States come to their rescue, meaning one States come to their rescue, meaning one of the countries I said, have they paid of the countries I said, have they paid of the countries? I said have they paid? They said what a horrible question there. They said what - a horrible question there, they said what a horrible question there, they go.
This is Hillary Clinton, don't they go? This is Hillary Clinton, don't they go? This is Hillary Clinton. Don't you know that we have a treaty. Yeah, we - you know that we have a treaty, yeah, we - you know that we have a treaty, yeah, we do and they have to pay. It's like two do and they have to pay. It's like two do and they have to pay.
It's like two, right, right, right? We have to go so. So think of it we - we have to go so. So think of it we - we have to go so. So think of it, we protect them, we protect them, they're not protect them, we protect them. They're not protect them, we protect them, they're not protecting us, protecting us, protecting us.
So we protect them against originally, so we protect them against originally. So we protect them against originally the Soviet Union. Now Russia. So we the Soviet Union now Russia. So we - the Soviet Union now Russia, so we protect them and many of them aren't protect them and many of them aren't protect them and many of them aren't paying or they're paying a fraction of paying or they're paying a fraction of paying or they're paying a Fraction of what they're supposed to be paying, so what they're supposed to be paying, so what they're supposed to be paying.
So all I say is I'm fine with NATO. You got - all I say is - I'm fine with NATO. You got - all I say is, I'm fine with NATO, you got to make it more flexible for terrorism to make it more flexible for terrorism to make it more flexible for terrorism. Okay, got ta, make it got ta, have people pay okay, got ta, make it, got ta, have people pay okay, got ta, make it, got ta, have people pay.
So we're paying a fortune for NATO and so we're paying a fortune for NATO. And so we're paying a fortune for NATO. And usually what the press does is they'll usually - what the press does is they'll usually - what the press does is they'll say, okay. And I'm telling you to search say, okay, and I'm telling you to search say okay, and I'm telling you to search for different reason because our country for different reason because our country for different reason because our country is broke, but we have so much fat out Is broke, but we have so much fat out is broke, but we have so much fat out there.
We could make our country so rich there we could make our country so rich there we could make our country. So rich, again, we can do things that are again, we can do things that are again we can do things that are unbelievable. These are just stories, unbelievable. These are just stories, unbelievable.
These are just stories. These are just stories. So I was killed. These are just stories, so I was killed. These are just stories. So I was killed on NATO. I gave a great answer. What are on NATO? I gave a great answer. What are on NATO? I gave a great answer. What are you thinking NATO? It's absolutely I you thinking NATO, it's absolutely I you thinking NATO, it's absolutely I never - in all fairness, I am a business never in all fairness.
I am a business never in all fairness. I am a business person building buildings and doing person, building buildings and doing person, building buildings and doing things all over the world. And I'm doing things all over the world and I'm doing things all over the world and I'm doing things and built a great company.
I built things and built a great company. I built things and built a great company. I built a great company and - but I'm doing that a great company and - but I'm doing that a great company and - but I'm doing that. That's what I'm doing, something like that's what I'm doing something like that's what I'm doing.
Something like NATO was not high on my list. Does that NATO was not high on my list does that NATO was not high on my list. Does that make sense? Yeah, wasn't like gee whiz, let make sense. Yeah, wasn't like gee whiz, let make sense. Yeah, wasn't like gee whiz, let me tell you everything about NATO, but I me tell you everything about NATO, but I me tell you everything about NATO, but I can learn.
I'm a really fast learner in can learn. I'm a really fast learner in can learn. I'm a really fast learner in like 10 minutes. I know a lot about NATO like 10 minutes. I know a lot about NATO like 10 minutes. I know a lot about NATO, right, but he asked me this question just right, but he asked me this question just right, but he asked me this question just I didn't know he's going to talk about - I didn't know he's going to talk about - I didn't know.
He's going to talk about NATO, what do you think about NATO? I said NATO, what do you think about NATO? I said NATO, what do you think about NATO? I said it's obsolete number one. Number two, it - it's obsolete number one. Number two, it - it's obsolete, number one. Number two, it doesn't cover terrorism, which is true, doesn't cover terrorism, which is true, doesn't cover terrorism, which is true.
And then they - we changed it right to and then they - we changed it right to. And then they - we changed it right to cover terrorism. And number three, because cover terrorism. And number three, because cover terrorism. And number three, because they heard this that many of the - they heard this that many of the - they heard this that many of the countries aren't paying or aren't countries aren't paying or aren't countries aren't paying or aren't carrying their weight and everybody carrying their weight.
And everybody carrying their weight and everybody the next day, they laughed, they said he the next day they laughed, they said he the next day they laughed, they said he doesn't know. Foreign policy headlines doesn't know foreign policy headlines doesn't know foreign policy headlines. Trump wants to abandon NATO. I didn't Trump wants to abandon NATO. I didn't Trump wants to abandon NATO. I didn't want a bend in it.
I didn't say that. I want a bend in it. I didn't say that I want a bend in it. I didn't say that. I didn't say that actually the New York didn't say that actually the New York didn't say that actually the New York Times was the only one they covered it. Times was the only one they covered it. Times was the only one they covered it correctly, which is hard to believe correctly, which is hard to believe correctly, which is hard to believe because they never cover anything because they never cover anything because they never cover anything correct.
All right. But Trump wants to correct all right, but Trump wants to correct all right? But Trump wants to abandon nano. Then we had Japan where we abandon nano, then we had Japan where we abandon nano. Then we had Japan where we pay more than 50 %. The cost of their pay more than 50 %, the cost of their pay more than 50 % the cost of their defense and we've got the maniac pretty defense and we've got the maniac pretty defense and we've got the maniac pretty close to him.
You know North Korea and we close to him, you know North Korea and we close to him, you know North Korea and we pay for South Korea 28,000, so pay for South Korea 28,000, so pay for South Korea 28,000. So on the line we pay and we pay for all on the line we pay and we pay for all on the line we pay and we pay for all these countries.
And I'll never forget these countries, and I'll never forget these countries, and I'll never forget, I'm talking about Japan. I love Japan. I'm talking about Japan. I love Japan. I'm talking about Japan. I love Japan, Japan square. It's a great country that Japan square, it's a great country that Japan square, it's a great country that great people have many friends in Japan, great people have many friends in Japan.
Great people have many friends in Japan. They buy my apartments all the time. They - they buy my apartments all the time. They - they buy my apartments all the time. They sell us cars, the cars come off like sell us cars, the cars come off like sell us cars, the cars come off like forget it, we send them wheat.
It's a fair - forget it, we send them wheat, it's a fair forget it. We send them wheat, it's a fair trade. They get week, we get cost fair trade, they get week, we get cost fair trade, they get week, we get cost fair trip, okay. It comes off like NASA, the trip, okay, it comes off like NASA, the trip, okay, it comes off like NASA, the right like NASCAR, Brian French, the great right, like NASCAR, Brian French, the great right like NASCAR, Brian French, the great Brian, France of Nestor.
So they come off, Brian, France of Nestor. So they come off, Brian, France of Nestor. So they come off the boats, right? The boats, right? The boats, right? They go in 50 miles an hour coming off, they go in 50 miles an hour coming off. They go in 50 miles an hour coming off, that's Japan, plenty of money.
So a that's Japan, plenty of money. So a that's Japan, plenty of money. So a general gets up to speak and he said, mr. general gets up to speak. And he said, mr. general gets up to speak and he said mr. Trump doesn't understand that Japan pays. Trump doesn't understand that Japan pays. Trump doesn't understand that Japan pays us 50 % of the cost of their defense, 50 % us 50 % of the cost of their defense, 50 %, us 50 % of the cost of their defense 50 %. He was so proud of them.
So I get a call, he was so proud of them, so I get a call. He was so proud of them. So I get a call from one of the newspapers. Mr. Trump from one of the newspapers, mr. Trump from one of the newspapers, mr. Trump general or Colonel or whatever the hell general or Colonel or whatever the hell general or Colonel or whatever the hell he was said that Japan is paying for 50 %. He was said that Japan is paying for 50 %. He was said that Japan is paying for 50 %. They actually thought it was good.
Do you - they actually thought it was good. Do you - they actually thought it was good. Do you have a comment? I said, yeah, why aren't have a comment, I said yeah, why aren't have a comment. I said yeah, why aren't they paying for 100 %, why? What - why why? And remember, you have to be prepared to - and remember you have to be prepared to - and remember you have to be prepared to walk.
They have to always be prepared to walk. They have to always be prepared to walk. They have to always be prepared to walk NATO with these countries, walk NATO with these countries, walk NATO with these countries. I'm not - we're not gonna fit. This isn't - I'm not - we're not gonna fit. This isn't - I'm not - we're not gonna fit.
This isn't 4050 years ago, okay? We end up in World 4050 years ago, okay? We end up in World 4050 years ago, okay? We end up in World War 3 over a country that nobody ever War 3 over a country that nobody ever War 3 over a country that nobody ever heard of heard of heard of. That's attacked okay. Now if they live up, that's attacked okay.
Now if they live up, that's attacked okay. Now if they live up to their obligations, does that make to their obligations, does that make to their obligations? Does that make sense? But some people say that's a sense, but some people say that's a sense. But some people say that's a horrible thing to say, horrible thing to say, horrible thing to say because of the treaty, I'll say about because of the treaty, I'll say about because of the treaty, I'll say about Japan Street.
So we have a treaty with Japan Street. So we have a treaty with Japan Street, so we have a treaty with Japan. If Japan is attacked, we have to go Japan. If Japan is attacked, we have to go Japan. If Japan is attacked, we have to go with our full force and might. And with our full force and might and with our full force and might and protect Japan if the United States is protect Japan, if the United States is protect Japan, if the United States is attacked, Japan doesn't have to lift a attacked.
Japan doesn't have to lift a attacked. Japan doesn't have to lift a finger. They don't have to do who makes finger, they don't have to do who makes finger, they don't have to do who makes these deals no seriously who makes these these deals no seriously who makes these these deals no seriously who makes these deals okay.
And we have so many folks, I deals, okay, and we have so many folks I deals, okay. And we have so many folks I could stand here all day and tell you could stand here all day and tell you could stand here all day and tell you stories that you wouldn't believe but stories that you wouldn't believe but stories that you wouldn't believe.
But here's the story. I'm running against a - here's the story. I'm running against a - here's the story. I'm running against a crooked person. I'm running against a crooked person. I'm running against a crooked person. I'm running against a dishonest person. You know she's dishonest person. You know, she's dishonest person, you know she's dishonest when she talks about like my dishonest when she talks about like my dishonest when she talks about like my campaign, when these guys, as much as they campaign when these guys, as much as they campaign when these guys, As much as they can't stand me say there's never been - can't stand me say there's never been, can't stand me say there's never been anything like this campaign and she's anything like this campaign and she's anything like this campaign and she's saying about my campaign because saying About my campaign because saying about my campaign because somebody wrote it and she was too lazy, somebody wrote it and she was too lazy, somebody wrote it and she was too lazy to correct it.
That's all I mean if to correct it. That's all. I mean, if to correct it, that's all - I mean, if that's all look, we're running against a - that's all look, we're running against a - that's all look. We're running against a person that was just accused of being person that was just accused of being person that was just accused of being negligent and being other things and negligent and being other things and negligent and being other things and lying lying.
How do you lie to the FBI lying lying? How do you lie to the FBI lying lying? How do you lie to the FBI and does that mean the answer she lied and does that mean the answer she lied and does that mean the answer she lied. How do you lie to the FBI and now you're - how do you lie to the FBI and now you're - how do you lie to the FBI and now you're running for president seriously running for president seriously running for president.
Seriously, how do you lie to the FBI and now you're - how do you lie to the FBI and now you're - how do you lie to the FBI and now you're running for president. How does that running for president? How does that running for president? How does that happen happen happen, right? You know what I've been saying.
I've been, you know what I've been saying. I've been, you know what I've been saying. I've been saying let's just beat her on November saying, let's just beat her on November saying, let's just beat her on November race, but you know what, you know what I'm race, but you know what, you know what I'm race, but you know what, you know, what I'm starting to agree with you.
I'll tell you starting to agree with you. I'll tell you starting to agree with you. I'll tell you times tired of saying, you know, it's times tired of saying, you know, it's times tired of saying you know, it's interesting every time I mention her interesting every time I mention her interesting every time I mention her, everyone screams lock her up, lock her Up everyone screams lock her up, lock her up, everyone screams lock her up, lock her up, lock her up, they keep script and you lock her up.
They keep script and you lock her up. They keep script and you know what I do, I've been nice but after know what I do, I've been nice but after know what I do, I've been nice. But after watching that performance last night, watching that performance last night, watching that performance last night such lies, I don't have to be so nice such lies, I don't have to be so nice such lies, I don't have to be so nice anymore.
I'm taking the gloves off right anymore. I'm taking the gloves off right anymore. I'm taking the gloves off, right. Yes, thankfully take the glove, right, taking the gloves on just remember this. Taking the gloves on just remember this taking the gloves on just remember this Trump is going to be no more.
Mr. nice Trump is going to be no more. Mr. nice Trump is going to be no more. Mr. nice guy tell Hillary, I'm not gonna be nice tell Hillary, I'm not gonna be nice tell Hillary, I'm not gonna be nice anymore. I've been very nice storm so you anymore. I've been very nice storm so you anymore. I've been very nice storm.
So you ready actually some of the folks they ready actually some of the folks they ready actually some of the folks they defeated, they probably would say play he defeated, they probably would say play he defeated, they probably would say play, he was not very nice. Look, look, let me just was not very nice.
Look, look, let me just was not very nice. Look, look, let me just tell you she is a disaster. Tell you she is a disaster, tell you she is a disaster. She talks now changed, right? Oh, by the - she talks now changed, right? Oh, by the - she talks now changed, right? Oh, by the way. And you saw yesterday, so I've been way and you saw yesterday.
So I've been way and you saw yesterday, so I've been talking, we got to renegotiate. And after talking, we got to renegotiate and after talking we got to renegotiate and after the worst trade deal ever made in the - the worst trade deal ever made in the - the worst trade deal ever made in the history of our country, probably in the history of Our country probably in the history of our country probably in the history of the world, okay, you know history of the world, okay.
You know history of the world, okay. You know they've just emptied. So did you see what they've just emptied? So did you see what they've just emptied? So did you see what she said? I'm getting criticized. This is - she said I'm getting criticized. This is - she said I'm getting criticized. This is four months and now yesterday she said four months and now yesterday she said four months and now yesterday she said we have to start thinking about - we have to start thinking about - we have to start thinking about renegotiating our trade dish.
You never renegotiating our trade dish, you never renegotiating our trade dish. You never said that. She never said that she never said that she never said that she never said that she never said that she never said that. And by the way, she's never said that. And by the way, she's never said that. And by the way, she's never gonna do it because she's controlled by gonna do it because she's controlled by gonna do it because she's controlled by the special interest.
So I spent close to the special interest. So I spent close to the special interest, so I spent close to 60 million dollars in my campaign. I put 60 million dollars in my campaign. I put 60 million dollars in my campaign. I put up my own money on the primers. Now I'm up my own money on the primers now I'm up my own money on the primers now I'm spending a lot of money on this, but I'm spending a lot of money on this, but I'm spending a lot of money on this, but I'm also raising Money, by the way, for the also raising money by the way for the also raising money by the way, for the small disclose of the Republican Party, small disclose of the Republican Party, small disclose of the Republican Party and the RNC, Republican, National and the RNC Republican.
National and the RNC, Republican, National Committee, Reince Priebus is doing a Committee. Reince Priebus is doing a Committee. Reince Priebus is doing a fantastic job, but I'm putting up a lot fantastic job, but I'm putting up a lot fantastic job. But I'm putting up a lot of money too for the general election of money too for the general election of money too for the general election, the last month, last month, they said mr.
jump would you last month, they said mr. jump would you last month, they Said mr. jump, would you put up two million dollars as a match, I put up two million dollars as a match, I put up two million dollars as a match I said. Yeah. Okay, fine said, yeah. Okay, fine said, yeah. Okay, fine. Turned out to be three point eight, I turned out to be three point eight, I turned out to be three point eight.
I said what the hell happened. I said I said what the hell happened. I said I said what the hell happened. I said I said how much is it, I think it's three said how much is it. I think it's three said how much is it. I think it's three point eight, I don't even know what it I point eight, I don't even know what it I point eight, I don't even know what it - I don't care what it is because it doesn't - don't care what it is because it doesn't don't care.
What it is, because it doesn't matter to me, I just want to win. We got ta matter to me, I just want to win. We got ta matter to me, I just want to win. We got ta win this election, but I'm putting up a win this election, but I'm putting up a win this election, but I'm putting up a lot of money for the general.
We're lot of money for the general, we're lot of money for the general we're raising and I'll tell you the beautiful raising and I'll tell you the beautiful raising and I'll tell you the beautiful thing, we're raising money at sixty one thing, we're raising money at sixty One thing we're raising money at sixty one dollars, I think it averaged in June and dollars, I think it averaged in June and dollars.
I think it averaged in June and we only started toward the middle of the - we only started toward the middle of the - we only started toward the middle of the month in June. We raised twenty-seven month in June. We raised twenty-seven month in June. We raised twenty-seven million dollars in small donations, that million dollars in small donations, that million dollars in small donations that doesn't happen to a Republican.
So I doesn't happen to a Republican. So I doesn't happen to a Republican. So I don't know what number you call, don't know what number you call, don't know what number you call Republican Party goes to. The Republican, Republican Party goes to the Republican, Republican Party goes to the Republican Party, goes to the RNC. I don't know what Party goes to the RNC, I don't know what Party goes to the RNC. I don't know what number you call why should I know a number you call why should I know a number you call why should I know a thing like that?
Find out and send them thing like that, find out and send them thing like that, find out and send them some money. Will you please find out but some money will you please find out, but some money will you please find out? But I'm putting up a lot of money and we're - I'm putting up a lot of money and we're - I'm putting up a lot of money and we're doing great.
And I see these ads that are doing great. And I see these ads that are doing great. And I see these ads that are running against me, they're vicious running against me. They're vicious running against me. They're vicious, they're vicious and they're false you they're vicious and they're false you they're vicious and they're false.
You know the crazy ad with megyn, kelly where know the crazy ad with megyn kelly where know the crazy ad with megyn kelly where they say blood coming out of her eyes. They say blood coming out of her eyes. They say blood coming out of her eyes blood coming out of wherever, wherever I blood coming out of wherever, wherever I blood coming out of wherever, wherever I was talking about her nose, maybe her was talking about her nose, maybe her was talking about her nose, maybe Her ears, but you know what, I wanted to do ears, but you know what, I wanted to do ears, but you know what I wanted to do and does this make sense what I wanted and does this make sense what I wanted and does this make sense?
What I wanted to do is I wanted to get back onto the - to do is I wanted to get back onto the - to do is I wanted to get back onto the question of taxes or economics. I said question of taxes or economics. I said question of taxes or economics, I said whatever and all of a sudden whatever, whatever and all of a sudden whatever, whatever and all of a sudden whatever because these are sick people, but really because these are sick people, but really because these are sick people.
But really it was knows with the reporter I am I it was knows with the reporter I am I it was knows with the reporter I am. I spent so much money on working with the spent so much money on working with the spent so much money on working with the disabled and making my business my disabled and making my business my disabled and making my business my buildings accessible millions and buildings accessible Millions and buildings accessible millions and millions of them, so they have me millions of them.
So they have me millions of them. So they have me imitating a reporter because I said that imitating a reporter because I said that imitating a reporter because I said that people were dancing in the streets or people were dancing in the streets or people were dancing in the streets or dancing on the Rooftops or something dancing on the rooftops or something dancing on the rooftops or something when the World Trade Center was knocked when the World Trade Center was knocked when the World Trade Center was knocked down, right?
And a lot of people disputed down, right? And a lot of people disputed down right and a lot of people disputed that now all over the world. They were a - that now all over the world, they were a that now all over the world. They were a lot of people, a lot of reports, but lot of people, a lot of reports, but lot of people, a lot of reports, but pretty sad things, right.
You got the pretty sad things right. You got the pretty sad things right. You got the world trades and thousands of people, world trades and thousands of people, world trades and thousands of people jumping out of that. Jumping out of that, jumping out of that building and getting killed and you have building and getting killed and you have building and getting killed and you have people that are happy about it, right.
So people that are happy about it, right. So people that are happy about it, right. So I said dancing, rooftop street, whatever I said, dancing rooftop street, whatever I said, dancing, rooftop street, whatever, and we couldn't find too much stuff and we couldn't find too much stuff and we couldn't find too much stuff confirming what I said all of a sudden confirming What I said all of a sudden confirming what I said all of a sudden somebody comes up with an article, okay?
Somebody comes up with an article, okay? Somebody comes up with an article, okay? And the article is written by this guy and the article is written by this guy and the article is written by this guy who said, he met me many, many years ago who said, he met me many, many years ago who said he met me many, many Years ago and the article is a great article for - and the article is a great article for and the article is a great article for me because it talked about dancing over me because it talked about dancing over me because it talked about dancing over things.
So I said, here's an article, I things - so I said here's an article, I things - so I said here's an article. I think he was with the Washington Post think he was with the Washington Post. Think he was with the Washington Post when he wrote the article something when he wrote the article something when he wrote the article something Times Washington Post, but whatever and Times Washington Post, but whatever and Times Washington Post but whatever.
And he wrote this article and it was great. I - he wrote this article and it was great. I - he wrote this article and it was great. I said here's the article and it really said, here's the article. And it really said, here's the article and it really shut a lot of people up. You know, it was shut a lot of people up, you know, it was shut a lot of people up, you know, it was - it was really sort of pretty much on - it was really sort of pretty much on - it was really sort of pretty much on point, Not on to present, but pretty much point not on to present, but pretty much point not on to present, but pretty much on point.
It was an article, but it was an on point, it was an article, but it was an on point, it was an article. But it was an article written by a major newspaper and article written by a major newspaper and article written by a major newspaper. And the author of the article was this guy. The author of the article was this guy.
The author of the article was this guy. And they started calling him the press and they started calling him the press and they started calling him the press. You remember this whole thing, does you remember this whole thing, does you remember this whole thing, does everybody - remember they started calling everybody.
Remember, they started calling everybody. Remember, they started calling him, the press started calling and him the press started calling and him the press started calling and they're driving him like they're called. They're driving him like they're called. They're driving him like they're called him a lot.
And obviously the other side him a lot and obviously the other side him a lot. And obviously the other side of things started calling him also of things started calling him also of things started calling him also saying this articles not good because saying this articles not good because saying this articles not good because this is sort of confirming what Trump is This is sort of confirming what Trump is.
This is sort of confirming what Trump is saying. They were dancing, they were happy saying they were dancing. They were happy saying they were dancing. They were happy that the World Trade Center was - this is that the World Trade Center was this is that the World Trade Center was - this is not good. So all of a sudden the guy and not good, so all of a sudden the guy and not good.
So all of a sudden, the guy and I think by that time, the article was, I think by that time, the article was, I think by that time, the article was almost 15 years old. He starts changing almost 15 years old. He starts changing almost 15 years old. He starts changing the article, but he made a mistake, he the article, but he made a mistake, he the article.
But he made a mistake. He this he then I didn't know what he this he then I didn't know what he this he then I didn't know what he looked like. Looked like looked like. I didn't know that he was disabled. I - I didn't know that he was disabled. I - I didn't know that he was disabled, I didn't know it. I didn't know it at all.
I didn't know it. I didn't know it at all. I didn't know it. I didn't know it at all. I had no idea. So I started imitating had no idea. So I started imitating had no idea, so I started imitating somebody. I didn't speak to the guy somebody. I didn't speak to the guy somebody. I didn't speak to the guy somebody that was groveling, just you somebody that was groveling just you somebody that was groveling.
Just you everybody know what grovel grovel is, everybody know what grovel grovel is, everybody know what grovel grovel is when you do, I won't do the act because when you do, I won't do the act because when you do, I won't do the act because they'll do A whole big thing, I won't, but they'll do a whole big thing.
I won't. But they'll do a whole big thing. I won't. But at the time I did the act, I did the - at the time I did the act. I did the - at the time. I did the act, I did the whole thing with groveling and I said whole thing with groveling and I said whole thing with groveling and I said he's groveling. He said no, no.
The article, he's groveling, he said no, no. The article, he's groveling, he said no, no. The article - I was wrong, I was wrong. I was wrong. The article and I was doing a whole big the article and I was doing a whole big the article and I was doing a whole big number, right? I was wrong, I promise you I number right.
I was wrong. I promise you I number right. I was wrong. I promise you. I made a mistake when I wrote the article, made a mistake when I wrote the article, made a mistake when I wrote the article, he was graveling grovel, grovel grovel, he was graveling, grovel, grovel grovel. He was graveling, grovel, grovel grovel, right?
That was the end of it, all of a right, that was the end of it, all of a right, that was the end of it. All of a sudden I get reports that I was sudden I get reports that I was sudden I get reports that I was imitating a reporter that was imitating a reporter that was imitating a reporter that was handicapped.
I would never do that and handicapped. I would never do that and handicapped, I would never do that and we'd never do that. We'd never do that. We'd never do that. It's not in my vocabulary and I spend, it's not in my vocabulary and I spend, it's not in my vocabulary and I spend millions of does. It's crooked media, I millions of does.
It's crooked media, I millions of does. It's crooked media. I spend millions so now and I figured that spend millions so now and I figured that spend millions so now and I figured that was fine, was fine, was fine because I would never do that. But then because I would never do that. But then because I would never do that, but then the guy that wrote the article who by the guy that wrote the article who by the guy that wrote the article who, by the way James II article, he said he'd the way James II article.
He said he'd the way James II article, he said he'd made a mistake in all this stuff right, made a mistake in all this stuff right, made a mistake in all this stuff, right? Grovel he said, but Donald Trump knows me grovel he said, but Donald Trump knows me, grovel he said, but Donald Trump knows me. Oh, really oh, really.
Oh, really. I know he met me when I was with - I won't - I know he met me when I was with - I won't - I know he met me when I was with - I won't even mention them, but the newspaper one even mention them. But the newspaper one even mention them, but the newspaper - one of the worst papers in the world, I was of the worst papers in the world.
I was of the worst papers in the world. I was used with a different paper real. It's used with a different paper real. It's used with a different paper real. It's going out of business very soon anyway going out of business very soon anyway going out of business very soon anyway. It's a good, but let me tell you he met, it's a good, but let me tell you he met, it's a good, but let me tell you, he met me when I was with another newspaper.
I me - when I was with another newspaper, I me when I was with another newspaper, I think he said in 1988, okay. So now we're think he said in 1988, okay. So now we're think he said in 1988, okay. So now we're talking about, it was I guess 2016 we're talking about, it was I guess 2016 we're talking about it was I guess 2016, we're talking 2015, you know, whenever this took talking 2015, you know, whenever this took talking 2015, you know, whenever this took place, 2015, so I met him many years ago place 2015, so I met him many years ago place 2015. So I met him many years ago and I met him more than once he said you and I met him more than once.
He said you and I met him more than once he said you know how many reporters I make. I'd meet know how many reporters I make. I'd meet know how many reporters I make. I'd meet guys look at this guy's I meet guys. I guys look at this guy's I meet guys. I guys look at this guy's I meet guys, I meet so many reporters.
I meet him. They meet so many reporters. I meet him. They meet so many reporters. I meet him. They quote somebody. They're coming out of my quote, somebody. They're coming out of my quote, somebody. They're coming out of my ears, okay? I made so many reporters. So ears, okay, I made so many reporters. So ears, okay.
I made so many reporters. So they do a commercial crooked, Hillary and they do a commercial crooked, Hillary and they do a commercial crooked, Hillary and she knew this stuff. So they do the - she knew this stuff, so they do the - she knew this stuff, so they do the commercial like a mocking a person with commercial like a mocking, a person with commercial like a mocking, a person with disability.
I'm not - I'm not disability, I'm not - I'm not disability. I'm not - I'm not. And by the way I did, I certainly did I - and by the way, I did, I certainly did I - and by the way, I did, I certainly did. I have a very good memory. I don't remember, have a very good memory, I don't remember have a very good memory.
I don't remember this guy. I wouldn't remember. I don't this guy. I wouldn't remember. I don't this guy. I wouldn't remember. I don't remember reporters that I see him on the - remember reporters that I see him on the - remember reporters that I see him on the phones. I see him all over the place they phones.
I see him all over the place they phones. I see him all over the place. They were all over the place were all over the place were all over the place reporters. But I'm supposed to remember reporters, but I'm supposed to remember reporters, but I'm supposed to remember some guy listen to this. I'm supposed to some guy listen to this.
I'm supposed to some guy listen to this. I'm supposed to remember some guy from 1980. So here's remember some guy from 1980. So here's remember some guy from 1980. So here's the story. So they do a commercial the story. So they do a commercial the story, so they do a commercial. Hillary, did you see with the beautiful Hillary, did you see with the beautiful Hillary, did you see with the beautiful little children watching as I'm little children watching as I'm little children watching as I'm supposedly mocking a person with supposedly mocking a person with supposedly mocking a Person with disabilities and I spend millions a year, disabilities and I spend millions a year.
Disabilities and I spend millions a year or millions of dollars on ramp or millions of dollars on ramp or millions of dollars on ramp and get rid of the stairs and different. And get rid of the stairs and different and get rid of the stairs and different kinds of elevators all over. And I'm kinds of elevators all over and I'm kinds of elevators all over and I'm gonna mock, I would never do that number gonna mock.
I would never do that number gonna mock. I would never do that. Number one, I have a good heart. Number two, I'm a one. I have a good heart. Number two, I'm a one. I have a good heart. Number two, I'm a smart person, okay. And crooked, Hillary smart person, okay, and crooked, Hillary smart person, okay, and crooked, Hillary Clinton and crooked, dishonest, Hillary Clinton and crooked, dishonest, Hillary Clinton and crooked, dishonest, Hillary Clinton.
She knows that. And crooked Clinton, she knows that. And crooked Clinton, she knows that. And crooked, Hillary Clinton puts that up and talks. Hillary Clinton puts that up and talks. Hillary Clinton puts that up and talks about anybody that would mock the - about anybody that would mock the - about anybody that would mock the disabled.
I didn't mock the disabled disabled. I didn't mock the disabled disabled, I didn't mock the disabled number one, number two with Meghan, all I number one. Number two with Meghan, all I number one. Number two with Meghan, all I did was - I want to get back on subject. I did - was - I want to get back on subject, I did was - I want to get back on subject, I said because I wouldn't say she exactly said because I wouldn't say she exactly said because I wouldn't say she exactly likes me.
Do we agree? So I said it was, likes me, do we agree. So I said it was likes me, do we agree. So I said it was blood coming out of her eyes blood, blood coming out of her eyes, blood, blood coming out of her eyes blood coming out. And then I said, I just want coming out and then I said I just want coming out and then I said I just want to get back on subject.
Let's go back to - to get back on subject. Let's go back to - to get back on subject. Let's go back to talk about taxes. So I said, oh, wherever, talk about taxes. So I said, oh, wherever talk about taxes. So I said, oh, wherever. So they said, because they're deviants. So they said because they're deviants.
So they said, because they're deviants deviants, they said that blood coming out deviants, they said that blood coming out deviants, they said that blood coming out of it and now they do a commercial, it's of it. And now they do a commercial, it's of it. And now they do a commercial, it's really sad, they know it's not true, they really sad.
They know it's not true, they really sad. They know it's not true, they do it anyway do it anyway do it anyway I had in mind knows, but it could have. I had in mind knows, but it could have - I had in mind knows, but it could have even been ears. I didn't think of the even been ears. I didn't think of the even been ears.
I didn't think of the other alternative. I didn't think so. You other alternative, I didn't think so you other alternative, I didn't think so. You know it's the first time I've really know. It's the first time I've really know. It's the first time I've really told that story to heard those two told that story to heard those two told that story to heard those two stories to a group, did you enjoy that stories to a group?
Did you enjoy that stories to a group? Did you enjoy that? This is not office space, did you enjoy - this is not office space, did you enjoy? This is not office space, did you enjoy? So. So just to finish up, look our country so, so just to finish up, look our country so. So just to finish up, look, our country and - and these are sort of Greek sirs and - and these are sort of Greek sirs.
And and these are sort of Greek sirs, because they tell you about how - because they tell you about how - because they tell you about how dishonest it is that they - they tell you dishonest it is that they - they tell you dishonest it is that they - they tell You about the incompetence like a fire, about the incompetence, like a fire, about the incompetence, like a fire marshal, not allowing those people that marshal not allowing those people that marshal not allowing those people that are in a room to come into this room are in a Room to come into this room are in a room to come into this room where we have a little - it just tells you where we have a little - it just tells you where we have a little.
It just tells you it's a disgusting thing. But it tells you it's a disgusting thing, but it tells you it's a disgusting thing, but it tells you about honesty, it tells you about common about honesty. It tells you about common about honesty. It tells you about common sense. It tells you that our country has sense, it tells you that our country has sense, it tells you that our country has a great future, think if we were in the a great future.
Think if we were in the a great future. Think if we were in the hole as deep as we are and everything hole as deep as we are and everything hole as deep as we are and everything was running perfectly right. I always was running perfectly right. I always was running perfectly right. I always like to buy a business that's in like to buy a business that's in like to buy a business that's in terrible shape because if you buy a terrible shape, because if you buy a terrible shape, because if you buy a business that's in great shape.
You have business that's in great shape, you have business that's in great shape, you have nothing to do, you can't cut, we have so nothing to do, you can't cut, we have so nothing to do. You can't cut. We have so many things we can do. So our country, many things we can do so our country, many things we can do.
So our country doesn't win anymore, but we're gonna doesn't win anymore. But we're gonna doesn't win anymore. But we're gonna start winning again folks, okay? We're gonna stop the Syrian migrants. We're gonna stop the Syrian migrants. We're gonna stop the Syrian migrants from coming into the United States.
We - from coming into the United States, we - from coming into the United States, we don't know where they come from. We don't - don't know where they come from. We don't don't know where they come from. We don't know who they are and you look all over know who they are and you look all over know who they are and you look all over the world, you look at Paris, you look at the world, you look at Paris, you look at the world, You look at Paris, you look at what just happened with the priests a, what just happened with the priests a, what just happened with the priests, a beloved priest, you look at what's going beloved priest, you look at what's going beloved priest.
You look at what's going on all over the world, we know nothing on all over the world. We know nothing on all over the world. We know nothing about them. We'll build safe zones. I'll about them. We'll build safe zones, I'll about them. We'll build safe zones. I'll get these Saudis and the Gulf states to get these Saudis and the Gulf states to get these Saudis and the Gulf states to build safe zones.
We will run it but build safe zones, we will run it, but build safe zones, we will run it. But they'll put up the money, they got plenty, they'll put up the money, they got plenty, they'll put up the money, they got plenty of money, other people's money you ever of money, other people's money you ever of money other people's money.
You ever hear the OPM other people's money and hear the OPM other people's money and hear the OPM other people's money and we're gonna be so smart. We're gonna be, we're gonna be so smart, we're gonna be, we're gonna be so smart. We're gonna be the smart people. If Hillary Clinton gets the smart people, if Hillary Clinton gets the smart people, if Hillary Clinton gets in, it's going to be four more years of in.
It's going to be four more years of in. It's going to be four more years of Obama and nobody wants four more years Obama and nobody wants four more years Obama and nobody wants four more years of Obama. Nobody will be weak on Isis of Obama. Nobody will be weak on Isis of Obama. Nobody will be weak on Isis, will be weak on the Border's will be weak on the Border's will be weak on the Border's will be weak on our military.
We're gonna will be weak on our military. We're gonna will be weak on our military. We're gonna rebuild that military folks, we're gonna rebuild that military folks. We're gonna rebuild that military folks. We're gonna get it. We're not going to be using old get it. We're not going to be using old get it.
We're not going to be using old aircraft, so I just want to tell you I aircraft. So I just want to tell you I aircraft. So I just want to tell you, I just want to tell you that I'm gonna be just want to tell you that I'm gonna be just want to tell you that I'm gonna be in Colorado a lot because - because in Colorado a lot, because - Because in Colorado, a lot because - because there's no way we shouldn't win this, there's no way we shouldn't win this.
There's no way we shouldn't win this state. These are great people, heavy state. These are great people, heavy state. These are great people, heavy military, tremendous respect for their military, tremendous respect for their military, tremendous respect for their police and law and order. That's me at police and law and order, that's me at police and law and order.
That's me. At the same time, we want to treat everybody the same time. We want to treat everybody the same time. We want to treat everybody fairly. I mean, when things happen, we want fairly - I mean, when things happen, we want fairly - I mean, when things happen, we want to make sure everybody does a great job to make sure everybody does a great job to make sure everybody does a great job.
We want to make sure people, but we want - we want to make sure people but we want - we want to make sure people, but we want law and order. We want great military, we law and order, we want great military, we law and order. We want great military, we want our vets to be so happy. These are want our vets to be so happy.
These are want our vets to be so happy. These are our great people and - and I'm gonna come our great people and - and I'm gonna come our great people and - and I'm gonna come back and I'm gonna spend time with you back and I'm gonna spend time with you back. And I'm gonna spend time with you and you're gonna say hello to us guys and you're gonna say hello to us guys and you're gonna say hello to us guys back again.
He's driving us crazy. Mr. back again, he's driving us crazy. Mr. back again, he's driving us crazy. Mr. Trump on November 8th, we promise we're Trump on November 8th. We promise we're Trump on November 8th. We promise we're gonna vote for you please. But give us a gonna vote for you please, but give us a gonna vote for you please, but give us a break.
You've been here enough, you've break - you've been here enough, you've break - you've been here enough, you've been here enough. Mr. Trump, please, you've been here enough. Mr. Trump, please, you've been here enough. Mr. Trump, please, you've been here enough sir. Right, right, right. Thank you everybody.
Thank you now thank you everybody. Thank you now thank you everybody. Thank you now because of your fire marshal, who I am because of your fire marshal, who I am because of your fire marshal, who I am NOT a fan of, he's probably a Democrat, NOT a fan of, he's probably a Democrat, NOT a fan of. He's probably a Democrat, probably probably a guy that doesn't get probably probably a guy that doesn't get probably probably a guy that doesn't get it.
I'm going to go into the other room it - I'm going to go into the other room. It - I'm going to go into the other room and say hello to people that didn't get and say hello to people that didn't get and say hello to people that didn't get your location. Okay. All right. Thank you your location. Okay. All right.
Thank you. Your location. Okay, all right, thank you everybody. I love you. I love Colorado del everybody. I love you. I love Colorado, del everybody. I love you. I love Colorado. Del look, November rates go out and vote. Look, November rates go out and vote. Look, November rates go out and vote. Thank you.